# Shekspire-sonnets

Sonnets of Shakespeare. 
 
 
 Сонеты Шекспира. 
 
 
 
 
 1.
 From fairest creatures we desire increase, That thereby beauty's rose might never die, But as the riper should by time decease, His tender heir might bear his memory: 
 But thou contracted to thine own bright eyes, Feed'st thy light's flame with self-substantial fuel, Making a famine where abundance lies, Thy self thy foe, to thy sweet self too cruel: 
 Thou that art now the world's fresh ornament, And only herald to the gaudy spring, Within thine own bud buriest thy content, And, tender churl, mak'st waste in niggarding: 
 Pity the world, or else this glutton be, To eat the world's due, by the grave and thee. 
 
 
 1."Новая строка"
 Прекрасное природа умножала, Живых цветов живительный магнит, О красоте, которая сияла, Наследник добрый память сохранит: 
 Но тот, кто замкнут на себе одном, Своим питаясь пламенем напрасно, Воистину обманут миражом, Ты - враг свой, и краса твоя - ужасна: 
 Ведь ты картины цельной лишь частица, И только вестник будущего дня, Не позволяя почке распуститься, Зачахнешь, не оставив даже пня: 
 Опомнись же, иначе - гроб с могилой Сожрут тебя, как многих, данник милый. 
 
 
 
 
 2.
 When forty winters shall besiege thy brow, And dig deep trenches in thy beauty's field, Thy youth's proud livery so gazed on now, Will be a totter'd weed of small worth held: 
 Then being asked, where all thy beauty lies, Where all the treasure of thy lusty days; To say, within thine own deep sunken eyes, Were an all-eating shame, and thriftless praise. 
 How much more praise deserv'd thy beauty's use, If thou couldst answer 'This fair child of mine Shall sum my count, and make my old excuse,' Proving his beauty by succession thine! 
 This were to be new made when thou art old, And see thy blood warm when thou feel'st it cold. 
 
 
 2.
 Когда переживёшь ты сорок зим, И взрежут лоб две тысячи морщин, Покажется ненужным и чужим, Весь гардероб, что выглядит большим: 
 И если спросят: "Где же твоя стать? Где спрятал клад своих беспечных дней?"; "В моих глазах", - ты будешь повторять, Мрачнея с каждым словом всё сильней. 
 О, если б мог понять судьбы веленье, И указать на труд, что ты создал: "Вот сил моих ушедших устремленье", Как веско б этот довод прозвучал! 
 Раздумий плод, взбурли ключом в крови, Согрей, взбодри, и сердце оживи. 
 
 
 
 
 3.
 Look in thy glass and tell the face thou viewest Now is the time that face should form another; Whose fresh repair if now thou not renewest, Thou dost beguile the world, unbless some mother. 
 For where is she so fair whose unear'd womb Disdains the tillage of thy husbandry? Or who is he so fond will be the tomb Of his self-love, to stop posterity? 
 Thou art thy mother's glass and she in thee Calls back the lovely April of her prime; So thou through windows of thine age shalt see, Despite of wrinkles this thy golden time. 
 But if thou live, remember'd not to be, Die single and thine image dies with thee. 
 
 
 3.
 Зеркальному скажи изображенью: "Твоё лицо ход времени состарит; И если не начнёшь ты обновленье, Судьба тебе подарков не подарит". 
 Зачем земле, невспаханной, страдать, И зарастать бурьяном, полной сил? И как того несчастного назвать, Кто свой талант в земле похоронил? 
 Ты - отраженье матери родной, И воскрешенье дней ее младых. И ты, сквозь окна осени златой, Увидишь урожай трудов своих. 
 Но помни, смертный, если ты - живой, С тобой умрёт зеркальный образ твой. 
 
 
 
 
 4.
 Unthrifty loveliness, why dost thou spend Upon thyself thy beauty's legacy? Nature's bequest gives nothing but doth lend, And being frank she lends to those are free. 
 Then, beauteous niggard, why dost thou abuse The bounteous largess given thee to give? Profitless usurer, why dost thou use So great a sum of sums, yet canst not live? 
 For having traffic with thyself alone, Thou of thyself thy sweet self dost deceive. Then how, when nature calls thee to be gone, What acceptable audit canst thou leave? 
 Thy unused beauty must be tomb'd with thee, Which, used, lives th' executor to be. 
 
 
 4.
 Зачем свой дар, природное наследство, Красавец-мот, растрачиваешь в прах? Взаймы тебе даются эти средства, Всё, что истратишь, взвесят на весах. 
 Зачем талант, столь щедрый и огромный, Красавец-скряга, не пускаешь в ход? Зачем тебе он дан, купец никчёмный, Ведь скоро срок возврата подойдет? 
 С самим собой желая торговать, Ты в дураках оставишь сам себя. Природа ей отчет попросит дать, Что скажешь ты, губами шевеля? 
 Красивый прах забвенью подлежит, Но дел живая прелесть будет жить. 
 
 
 
 
 5.
 Those hours, that with gentle work did frame The lovely gaze where every eye doth dwell, Will play the tyrants to the very same And that unfair which fairly doth excel: 
 For never-resting time leads summer on To hideous winter and confounds him there; Sap check'd with frost and lusty leaves quite gone, Beauty o'ersnow'd and bareness every where: 
 Then, were not summer's distillation left, A liquid prisoner pent in walls of glass, Beauty's effect with beauty were bereft, Nor it nor no remembrance what it was: 
 But flowers distill'd though they with winter meet, Leese but their show; their substance still lives sweet. 
 
 
 5.
 Те самые часы, что создают Чудесный образ, взгляд к себе манящий, Безжалостно разрушат и убьют, Своей работы результат блестящий: 
 Неутомимо время, и за летом Зиме ужасной наступает срок; Былую красоту засыплет снегом, В деревьях и кустах застынет сок: 
 Он, жидкий пленник, если света мало, В темнице замкнут ледяных камней, И кажется, что красота увяла, Нет ни её, ни памяти о ней: 
 Но куст цветочный, зиму пережив, Вновь оживёт; поскольку дух в нем жив. 
 
 
 
 
 6.
 Then let not winter's ragged hand deface In thee thy summer, ere thou be distill'd: Make sweet some vial; treasure thou some place With beauty's treasure, ere it be self-kill'd. 
 That use is not forbidden usury, Which happies those that pay the willing loan; That's for thyself to breed another thee, Or ten times happier, be it ten for one; 
 Ten times thyself were happier than thou art, If ten of thine ten times refigured thee: Then what could death do, if thou shouldst depart, Leaving thee living in posterity? 
 Be not self-will'd, for thou art much too fair To be death's conquest and make worms thine heir. 
 
 
 6.
 Итак, чтоб не разрушил зимний ад, Тот летний луч, что пленника спасёт: Создай фиал; В нём сберегай свой клад, Пока к концу тропинка не придёт. 
 Купец, узнавший этот верный путь, Доволен, что долги вернёт обратно; Счастливец тот, кто видит свою суть, Кто видит больше, счастлив многократно; 
 Так, десять раз свой образ воплощая, Ты отражён в десятках слов живых: Что может смерть, когда ты, умирая, Свой светлый облик оставляешь в них? 
 А если нет, будь хоть светлее света, Червям достанется вся светлость эта. 
 
 
 
 
 7.
 Lo! in the orient when the gracious light Lifts up his burning head, each under eye Doth homage to his new-appearing sight, Serving with looks his sacred majesty; 
 And having climb'd the steep-up heavenly hill, Resembling strong youth in his middle age, Yet mortal looks adore his beauty still, Attending on his golden pilgrimage; 
 But when from highmost pitch, with weary car, Like feeble age, he reeleth from the day, The eyes, 'fore duteous, now converted are From his low tract and look another way: 
 So thou, thyself out-going in thy noon, Unlook'd on diest, unless thou get a son. 
 
 
 7.
 Эй! на востоке светлый, добрый луч, Коснулся глаз, подъём свой начиная, И всё живое, радуясь теплу, Его величью трепетно внимает; 
 Легко взобравшись на небесный холм, Как здоровяк, штурмующий преграды, Диск солнечный на небе голубом Дарит любовь и привлекает взгляды; 
 Но вот, устав, как немощный старик, Заканчивает день, мир, до свиданья, Но вслед тому, чей прежний вид поник, Уже не смотрят смертные созданья: 
 И твой закат не нужен никому, Солнцеподобный, ты идёшь во тьму. 
 
 
 
 
 8.
 Music to hear, why hear'st thou music sadly? Sweets with sweets war not, joy delights in joy. Why lovest thou that which thou receivest not gladly, Or else receivest with pleasure thine annoy? 
 If the true concord of well-tuned sounds, By unions married, do offend thine ear, They do but sweetly chide thee, who confounds In singleness the parts that thou shouldst bear. 
 Mark how one string, sweet husband to another, Strikes each in each by mutual ordering, Resembling sire and child and happy mother Who all in one, one pleasing note do sing: 
 Whose speechless song, being many, seeming one, Sings this to thee: 'thou single wilt prove none.' 
 
 
 8.
 Мелодию печальную ты слышишь? Сонеты не воюют с красотой. Так отчего, мой свет, ты грустью дышишь, Ужели раздражён стихов игрой? 
 В союзе гармоничном эти звуки, Быть может, обижают нежный слух, Так самого себя вини за муки, Поскольку как медведь ты тугоух. 
 Когда б имел способность замечать, Святых аскетов внял бы песнопенью, Поют тебе отец и сын и мать, Их гимн - полёт души и восхищенье: 
 Много загадок, разгадка одна: "Неспетая песня твоя не слышна". 
 
 
 
 
 9.
 Is it for fear to wet a widow's eye That thou consumest thyself in single life? Ah! if thou issueless shalt hap to die. The world will wail thee, like a makeless wife; 
 The world will be thy widow and still weep That thou no form of thee hast left behind, When every private widow well may keep By children's eyes her husband's shape in mind. 
 Look, what an unthrift in the world doth spend Shifts but his place, for still the world enjoys it; But beauty's waste hath in the world an end, And kept unused, the user so destroys it. 
 No love toward others in that bosom sits That on himself such murderous shame commits. 
 
 
 9.
 Ответь, ты в одиночестве затем, Чтобы жена не сделалась вдовою? Вдова не плачет, значит, нет проблем. Но плачет мир, весь мир белугой взвоет; 
 Твоей вдовою зарыдает мир, Уйдя, ты не оставил даже точки, Вдова хоть утешается детьми, Найдя ушедшего в глазах у дочки. 
 Пойми, боль неизбежного ухода, Нить жизни не прервёт ни вглубь, ни вширь; Но красота, не давшая приплода, Не сад оставит на земле - пустырь. 
 Кто свой талант впустую расточает, Не лучше, чем убийца поступает. 
 
 
 
 
 10.
 For shame! deny that thou bear'st love to any, Who for thyself art so unprovident. Grant, if thou wilt, thou art beloved of many, But that thou none lovest is most evident; 
 For thou art so possess'd with murderous hate That 'gainst thyself thou stick'st not to conspire. Seeking that beauteous roof to ruinate Which to repair should be thy chief desire. 
 O, change thy thought, that I may change my mind! Shall hate be fairer lodged than gentle love? Be, as thy presence is, gracious and kind, Or to thyself at least kind-hearted prove: 
 Make thee another self, for love of me, That beauty still may live in thine or thee. 
 
 
 10.
 Стыд! нрав медвежий и любовь медвежья, К лицу ль тебе, оставь, переменись. Ты нелюбим, но изменись в надежде, Что мир тебя полюбит, торопись; 
 Твой мозг в плену кровавого злодея, Что козни измышляя, губит плоть. Ищи же путь, как золотом владея, Извлечь его, и беса побороть. 
 О, изменись, изменится сонет! Ужели зло тебе милей любви? Будь светлым, ибо ты и сам - есть свет, Иначе свет - злодея умертвит: 
 Покуда красота твоя живая, Стань красотой, любовью заклинаю. 
 
 
 
 
 11.
 As fast as thou shalt wane, so fast thou growest In one of thine, from that which thou departest; And that fresh blood which youngly thou bestowest Thou mayst call thine when thou from youth convertest. 
 Herein lives wisdom, beauty and increase: Without this, folly, age and cold decay: If all were minded so, the times should cease And threescore year would make the world away. 
 Let those whom Nature hath not made for store, Harsh featureless and rude, barrenly perish: Look, whom she best endow'd she gave the more; Which bounteous gift thou shouldst in bounty cherish: 
 She carved thee for her seal, and meant thereby Thou shouldst print more, not let that copy die. 
 
 
 11.
 На землю упади посевом скорым, В рост, в рост направь зерно, скорей, скорей; И после из зерна, умрёшь в котором, Ты оживёшь, так торопись, успей. 
 И в этом сила, смысл и красота: Иначе глупость, старость и распад: Иначе путь, ведущий в никуда, Смерть от болезни лет так в шестьдесят. 
 Для грубияна, вора и лгуна Конец один - погибельный удар: Всё, что захочешь, то возьмёшь сполна; Но преумножь Природы светлый дар: 
 Тебе доверят тайную печать, Но только уговор - не потерять. 
 
 
 
 
 12.
 When I do count the clock that tells the time, And see the brave day sunk in hideous night; When I behold the violet past prime, And sable curls all silver'd o'er with white; 
 When lofty trees I see barren of leaves Which erst from heat did canopy the herd, And summer's green all girded up in sheaves Borne on the bier with white and bristly beard, 
 Then of thy beauty do I question make, That thou among the wastes of time must go, Since sweets and beauties do themselves forsake And die as fast as they see others grow; 
 And nothing 'gainst Time's scythe can make defence Save breed, to brave him when he takes thee hence. 
 
 
 12.
 Когда я наблюдаю за часами, И вижу день, пленённый мглой ночной; Когда фиалки траур пред глазами, Сквозь снег горчащей прядью смоляной; 
 Когда весь цвет, стоявших молодцами, Деревьев, вижу, облетел, сухой, И вижу воды, скованные льдами, И травы со щетиною седой; 
 Тогда, краса моя, я вопрошаю, Из тех ли ты, кому измерен срок? Ведь прелесть настоящая, живая, Умрёт, отдав преемнику свой сок; 
 Не трать секунд, иди, того взрасти, Кто должен чудный образ обрести. 
 
 
 
 
 13.
 O, that you were yourself! but, love, you are No longer yours than you yourself here live: Against this coming end you should prepare, And your sweet semblance to some other give. 
 So should that beauty which you hold in lease Find no determination: then you were Yourself again after yourself's decease, When your sweet issue your sweet form should bear. 
 Who lets so fair a house fall to decay, Which husbandry in honour might uphold Against the stormy gusts of winter's day And barren rage of death's eternal cold? 
 O, none but unthrifts! Dear my love, you know You had a father: let your son say so. 
 
 
 13.
 Ты был собой! теперь же, ученик, Не будешь жить как прежде, но иначе: Ты можешь подготовить, если вник, Себе преемника, дерзай, удачи. 
 Так красота наследная твоя Не знает: где ты будешь после смерти, Медвежья ли берлога ждёт тебя, Другой ли образ рок тебе расчертит. 
 Кто поручится в том, что крепкий дом Упадка избежит, и что хозяйство Не разорит зима, война, погром, Пожар, метеорит иль разгильдяйство? 
 Всё может быть! Но знай же, милый сын, Есть твой отец: и внук да будет с ним. 
 
 
 
 
 14.
 Not from the stars do I my judgment pluck; And yet methinks I have astronomy, But not to tell of good or evil luck, Of plagues, of dearths, or seasons' quality; 
 Nor can I fortune to brief minutes tell, Pointing to each his thunder, rain and wind, Or say with princes if it shall go well, By oft predict that I in heaven find: 
 But from thine eyes my knowledge I derive, And, constant stars, in them I read such art As truth and beauty shall together thrive, If from thyself to store thou wouldst convert; 
 Or else of thee this I prognosticate: Thy end is truth's and beauty's doom and date. 
 
 
 14.
 Я мудрость звёзд не похищаю, нет; Хотя и изучил небесны своды, Не дам прогноз ни бедствий, ни побед, Ни голода, ни мора, ни погоды; 
 Приметы не толкую, не сужу О каждом громе, ветре и дожде, Наследным принцам я не расскажу О счастье предвещающей звезде: 
 Твои глаза - вот верных две звезды, Что говорят об истине и свете, Что сеял, что взошло, что сделал ты, Всю правду мне откроют звёзды эти. 
 И если правды с красотой в них нет, То для тебя закончился сонет. 
 
 
 
 
 15.
 When I consider every thing that grows Holds in perfection but a little moment, That this huge stage presenteth nought but shows Whereon the stars in secret influence comment; 
 When I perceive that men as plants increase, Cheered and check'd even by the self-same sky, Vaunt in their youthful sap, at height decrease, And wear their brave state out of memory; 
 Then the conceit of this inconstant stay Sets you most rich in youth before my sight, Where wasteful Time debateth with Decay, To change your day of youth to sullied night; 
 And all in war with Time for love of you, As he takes from you, I engraft you new. 
 
 
 15.
 Когда я думаю, что всё живое Достигнет совершенства, но на миг. А что есть миг? ничто! ничто иное, Как тайное влиянье звёзд ночных; 
 Я думаю, что люди, как и травы, Достичь пытаясь неба головой, Смеются, право, ведь зенит их славы - Предвестник краха памяти былой; 
 И эта малость, взлёт с забвеньем рядом, Источник для меня картин иных, Как интригует Время-мот с Распадом, Желая день загнать в болото тьмы. 
 Против тебя Распад идет войной, Союзник-Время с ним, воитель злой. 
 
 
 
 
 16.
 But wherefore do not you a mightier way Make war upon this bloody tyrant, Time? And fortify yourself in your decay With means more blessed than my barren rhyme? 
 Now stand you on the top of happy hours, And many maiden gardens yet unset With virtuous wish would bear your living flowers, Much liker than your painted counterfeit: 
 So should the lines of life that life repair, Which this, Time's pencil, or my pupil pen, Neither in inward worth nor outward fair, Can make you live yourself in eyes of men. 
 To give away yourself keeps yourself still, And you must live, drawn by your own sweet skill. 
 
 
 16.
 Но почему бы Времени-Тирану Священную войну не объявить? И в бок ему на славном поле, бранном, Копьё из слабой рифмы не вонзить? 
 О, размахнись рука сил небывалых, На свете много девственных лесов, Куда медвежья лапа не ступала, В палитре много красочных цветов: 
 О, кисть моя, не то что кисть тирана, Весь мир, тот, что снаружи и внутри, Изобрази правдиво, без обмана, Останови мгновенье, раз, два, три. 
 Ты будешь жить, хотя уйдёшь, таким, Каков твой цвет, хорошим иль плохим. 
 
 
 
 
 17.
 Who will believe my verse in time to come, If it were fill'd with your most high deserts? Though yet, heaven knows, it is but as a tomb Which hides your life and shows not half your parts. 
 If I could write the beauty of your eyes And in fresh numbers number all your graces, The age to come would say 'This poet lies: Such heavenly touches ne'er touch'd earthly faces.' 
 So should my papers yellow'd with their age Be scorn'd like old men of less truth than tongue, And your true rights be term'd a poet's rage And stretched metre of an antique song: 
 But were some child of yours alive that time, You should live twice; in it and in my rhyme. 
 
 
 17.
 Ты спросишь, кто поверит словесам, В которых образ твой живей живого? Каким ты был, известно небесам, А прах могилой скрыт, и нет иного. 
 И если я воспел твой ясный свет, И красоту, и твой небесный дар, Не скажут ли потомки: "Лжёт поэт: Сей свет и не светил нам никогда". 
 И от насмешек сморщится бумага, Как старый дед, хвастун и мракобес, Поэт, разгневан, схватится за шпагу, И загрустит герой античных пьес: 
 Но если ты оставишь след на свете, Ты дважды жив; в нём и - моём сонете. 
 
 
 
 
 18.
 Shall I compare thee to a summer's day? Thou art more lovely and more temperate: Rough winds do shake the darling buds of May, And summer's lease hath all too short a date: 
 Sometime too hot the eye of heaven shines, And often is his gold complexion dimm'd; And every fair from fair sometime declines, By chance or nature's changing course untrimm'd; 
 But thy eternal summer shall not fade Nor lose possession of that fair thou owest; Nor shall Death brag thou wander'st in his shade, When in eternal lines to time thou growest: 
 So long as men can breathe or eyes can see, So long lives this and this gives life to thee. 
 
 
 18.
 Позволь, сравню тебя и летний день? Ты более красив, умерен также: Ведь ветры рвут цветущую сирень, А день пройдёт, и словно не был даже: 
 Порою солнце светит слишком ярко, И часто этот жар - недобрый знак; Бывает, гибнет тварь, когда ей жарко, Случайно, нет ли, но бывает так; 
 Но лету вечному не потускнеть, Не страшен жар и холод вечным почкам; Не страшен мрак тому, и злая смерть, Кто в вечных, добрых книгах пишет строчки: 
 Пока живёт и видит хоть один, Ты жив, поэт! и жизнь даешь другим. 
 
 
 
 
 19.
 Devouring Time, blunt thou the lion's paws, And make the earth devour her own sweet brood; Pluck the keen teeth from the fierce tiger's jaws, And burn the long-lived phoenix in her blood; 
 Make glad and sorry seasons as thou fleets, And do whate'er thou wilt, swift-footed Time, To the wide world and all her fading sweets; But I forbid thee one most heinous crime: 
 O, carve not with thy hours my love's fair brow, Nor draw no lines there with thine antique pen; Him in thy course untainted do allow For beauty's pattern to succeeding men. 
 Yet, do thy worst, old Time: despite thy wrong, My love shall in my verse ever live young. 
 
 
 19.
 Обжора-Время, когти львам тупи, С песком сравняй все камни пирамид; Из пасти тигров зубы с кровью рви, Пусть феникс-долгожитель в ней сгорит; 
 Смешай сезоны, землю и эфир, Топчи ногами, как угодно злись, Всё уничтожь, всю красоту, весь мир; От гнусности одной лишь удержись: 
 Не режь мою любовь; пока резцом, Резцом античным не оставит знак; Идущим следом на пути земном, Пусть путь осветит красоты маяк. 
 А, впрочем, Время: хочешь или нет, Сонет хранит любовь, и юный цвет. 
 
 
 
 
 20.
 A woman's face with Nature's own hand painted Hast thou, the master-mistress of my passion; A woman's gentle heart, but not acquainted With shifting change, as is false women's fashion; 
 An eye more bright than theirs, less false in rolling, Gilding the object whereupon it gazeth; A man in hue, all 'hues' in his controlling, Much steals men's eyes and women's souls amazeth. 
 And for a woman wert thou first created; Till Nature, as she wrought thee, fell a-doting, And by addition me of thee defeated, By adding one thing to my purpose nothing. 
 But since she prick'd thee out for women's pleasure, Mine be thy love and thy love's use their treasure. 
 
 
 20.
 О, царь и госпожа моей любви, В твоём лице есть мягкость женских красок; И бьётся сердце женское в груди, Под лживым одеяньем модных масок; 
 Не столь вертляв твой ясный женский глаз, Он золото от грязи отличает; А, полный силы, мужественный глас Избранниц и соперников пленяет. 
 Ты создан богом раньше, чем наседка; Страшатся горы гнева твоего, И, чтобы не обидеть словом едким, Одно прибавлю, больше ничего. 
 Коль шпилькою уколот, мук не дли, Используй же сокровища свои. 
 
 
 
 
 21.
 So is it not with me as with that Muse Stirr'd by a painted beauty to his verse, Who heaven itself for ornament doth use And every fair with his fair doth rehearse 
 Making a couplement of proud compare, With sun and moon, with earth and sea's rich gems, With April's first-born flowers, and all things rare That heaven's air in this huge rondure hems. 
 O' let me, true in love, but truly write, And then believe me, my love is as fair As any mother's child, though not so bright As those gold candles fix'd in heaven's air: 
 Let them say more than like of hearsay well; I will not praise that purpose not to sell. 
 
 
 21.
 Сонет - творенье Музы и мечты, Картин прекрасное изображенье, Где небо - часть орнамента, как ты, Где красота в чудесном обрамленье 
 Рождает связь, и гордое сравненье С луной и солнцем, морем и землёй, С апрельским цветом необыкновенным, И всем, что именуют красотой. 
 О, верь в правдивый смысл моих речей, Что я, как сына мать, тебя люблю, Хотя любовь сгорающих свечей, Возможно, превзойдёт любовь мою: 
 Пусть скажут больше, чем расслышит слух; Цель не обман, оставим похвалу. 
 
 
 
 
 22.
 My glass shall not persuade me I am old, So long as youth and thou are of one date; But when in thee time's furrows I behold, Then look I death my days should expiate. 
 For all that beauty that doth cover thee Is but the seemly raiment of my heart, Which in thy breast doth live, as thine in me: How can I then be elder than thou art? 
 O, therefore, love, be of thyself so wary As I, not for myself, but for thee will; Bearing thy heart, which I will keep so chary As tender nurse her babe from faring ill. 
 Presume not on thy heart when mine is slain; Thou gavest me thine, not to give back again. 
 
 
 22.
 Что стар я, не уверит вид зеркальный, Я стар и молод так же, как и ты; Нет у тебя следов морщин печальных, Смерть не изменит и мои черты. 
 Вся красота твоя, сам рассуди, Есть одеянье сердца моего, Которое живёт в твоей груди: Как можешь ты моложе быть его? 
 Поэтому, как я, будь осторожен, Не за себя боюсь, а за тебя; Пытаюсь сделать всё, что только можно, Твоё медвежье сердце возлюбя. 
 Закроешь сердце, я умру опять; Оно во мне, не забирай назад. 
 
 
 
 
 23.
 As an unperfect actor on the stage Who with his fear is put besides his part, Or some fierce thing replete with too much rage, Whose strength's abundance weakens his own heart. 
 So I, for fear of trust, forget to say The perfect ceremony of love's rite, And in mine own love's strength seem to decay, O'ercharged with burden of mine own love's might. 
 O, let my books be then the eloquence And dumb presagers of my speaking breast, Who plead for love and look for recompense More than that tongue that more hath more express'd. 
 O, learn to read what silent love hath writ: To hear with eyes belongs to love's fine wit. 
 
 
 23.
 Как незадачливый актёр на сцене, Вдруг из боязни позабывший роль, Или как лютый монстр в ужасной пене, Что духом пал и потерял контроль. 
 Так я, упомянуть совсем забыл, Однако важно соблюсти обряд, Коль кажется, что выбился из сил, На самом деле, силы просто спят. 
 О, просыпайся, книга. Будь моим Глашатаем, немым заговорившим, Оратором искусным, но простым, И словом, в поднебесье воспарившим. 
 Пусть больше, чем язык, расскажет слово: Пусть глаз услышит звук и мысль немого. 
 
 
 
 
 24.
 Mine eye hath play'd the painter and hath stell'd Thy beauty's form in table of my heart; My body is the frame wherein 'tis held, And perspective it is the painter's art. 
 For through the painter must you see his skill, To find where your true image pictured lies; Which in my bosom's shop is hanging still, That hath his windows glazed with thine eyes. 
 Now see what good turns eyes for eyes have done: Mine eyes have drawn thy shape, and thine for me Are windows to my breast, where-through the sun Delights to peep, to gaze therein on thee; 
 Yet eyes this cunning want to grace their art; They draw but what they see, know not the heart. 
 
 
 24.
 Мой глаз - художник, моё сердце - стол, Ты - чистый холст, лежащий на столе. Чтоб образ очертание обрёл, Изобразим картину на холсте. 
 Искусство в том, чтобы понять наверно, В чём искаженье верного лица; Грудь - студия; с отвагою примерной Всмотрись в неё глазами мудреца. 
 И за игрою глаз теперь смотри: Мой глаз рисует; образ для меня - Окно к тебе. Вдруг в студии, внутри Свет вспыхнул любопытного огня. 
 Пытливый взор желает знать итог; Но что увидит, кто бы ведать мог. 
 
 
 
 
 25.
 Let those who are in favour with their stars Of public honour and proud titles boast, Whilst I, whom fortune of such triumph bars, Unlook'd for joy in that I honour most. 
 Great princes' favourites their fair leaves spread But as the marigold at the sun's eye, And in themselves their pride lies buried, For at a frown they in their glory die. 
 The painful warrior famoused for fight, After a thousand victories once foil'd, Is from the book of honour razed quite, And all the rest forgot for which he toil'd: 
 Then happy I, that love and am beloved Where I may not remove nor be removed. 
 
 
 25.
 Пусть званьем, именем, высокой честью Гордится тот, кого ведёт звезда, Я неведом, успех мне неизвестен, Но у меня иная высота. 
 Высокий принц живёт с большим размахом, Но жизнью лёгкой летнего цветка, Коль скрылось солнце, то идёт всё прахом, И гордый блеск сменяет пустота. 
 Завоеватель мира, воин бравый, Из тысячи однажды проиграв, Лишится вмиг империи и славы, И мир забудет грозный его нрав: 
 Кто любит и любим, тот счастлив больше, Такое счастье длится много дольше. 
 
 
 
 
 26.
 Lord of my love, to whom in vassalage Thy merit hath my duty strongly knit, To thee I send this written embassage, To witness duty, not to show my wit: 
 Duty so great, which wit so poor as mine May make seem bare, in wanting words to show it, But that I hope some good conceit of thine In thy soul's thought, all naked, will bestow it; 
 Till whatsoever star that guides my moving Points on me graciously with fair aspect And puts apparel on my tatter'd loving, To show me worthy of thy sweet respect: 
 Then may I dare to boast how I do love thee; Till then not show my head where thou mayst prove me. 
 
 
 26.
 Мой принц, мой господин, моя любовь, Меня и Вашу честь судьба связала, Отправить к Вам посольство этих слов Велит мне долг смиренного вассала: 
 Долг так велик, а ум мой так ничтожен, Что точных слов мне трудно подобрать, Но добрая душа, надеюсь, всё же, Запутанность сумеет прочитать; 
 Ах, если б путеводная звезда Мне указала верную дорогу, Украсила б алмазная гряда Мои слова, в которых мало проку: 
 Как был бы горд любовью я моею; Пока же, принц, главы поднять не смею. 
 
 
 
 
 27.
 Weary with toil, I haste me to my bed, The dear repose for limbs with travel tired; But then begins a journey in my head, To work my mind, when body's work's expired: 
 For then my thoughts, from far where I abide, Intend a zealous pilgrimage to thee, And keep my drooping eyelids open wide, Looking on darkness which the blind do see 
 Save that my soul's imaginary sight Presents thy shadow to my sightless view, Which, like a jewel hung in ghastly night, Makes black night beauteous and her old face new. 
 Lo! thus, by day my limbs, by night my mind, For thee and for myself no quiet find. 
 
 
 27.
 От дел устав, я падаю в кровать, Всё, отдых, спи, измученное тело; Но только начинаю засыпать, Приходит мыслей рой, им нет предела: 
 Спешат они, подобно голубицам, В далёкий путь ко взгляду твоему, Покоя нет слабеющим глазницам, Впиваются, открытые, во тьму, 
 И мнится, что души неясный квант - Есть твоя тень, невидимая глазу, Которая как солнечный брильянт, Горит во мгле, и освещает разум. 
 Эй! Стоп, заботы днём, а думы ночью Мой мир привычный раздробили в клочья. 
 
 
 
 
 28.
 How can I then return in happy plight, That am debarr'd the benefit of rest? When day's oppression is not eased by night, But day by night, and night by day, oppress'd? 
 And each, though enemies to either's reign, Do in consent shake hands to torture me; The one by toil, the other to complain How far I toil, still farther off from thee. 
 I tell the day, to please them thou art bright And dost him grace when clouds do blot the heaven: So flatter I the swart-complexion'd night, When sparkling stars twire not thou gild'st the even. 
 But day doth daily draw my sorrows longer And night doth nightly make grief's strength seem stronger. 
 
 
 28.
 Как мне вернуть себе счастливый вид, Когда лишился сна я и покоя? Коль ночь дневные раны не целит, И день как ночь, ну что это такое? 
 Вражду забыв, друг другу помогая, Меня терзают, дух мой изнемог; Один трудом, виденьями другая, Как я устал, и как же ты далёк. 
 Послушай, день, он ясен, как и ты, Когда печальных туч на небе нет: Смуглянка, у него твои черты, Ночной звездою светит его свет. 
 Но день за днём лишь умножают горе, И ночи этой странной песне вторят. 
 
 
 
 
 29.
 When, in disgrace with fortune and men's eyes, I all alone beweep my outcast state And trouble deaf heaven with my bootless cries And look upon myself and curse my fate, 
 Wishing me like to one more rich in hope, Featured like him, like him with friends possess'd, Desiring this man's art and that man's scope, With what I most enjoy contented least; 
 Yet in these thoughts myself almost despising, Haply I think on thee, and then my state, Like to the lark at break of day arising From sullen earth, sings hymns at heaven's gate; 
 For thy sweet love remember'd such wealth brings That then I scorn to change my state with kings. 
 
 
 29.
 Когда, гонимый роком и людьми, Один, как привидение, брожу, Кляну судьбу и небо, ночи, дни, И утешенья слов не нахожу, 
 Богатства жажду, роскоши, друзей, Чтоб в комплиментах утопал мой гений, Хочу почёта, золотых цепей, И много-много-много наслаждений; 
 А после презираю эти думы, Нашёл, о чем мечтать, глупец, медведь; Быть птицей; да! и от земли угрюмой Взмыть в высоту, и в небе песни петь; 
 К тебе лечу, внизу леса, поля, Свободней я любого короля. 
 
 
 
 
 30.
 When to the sessions of sweet silent thought I summon up remembrance of things past, I sigh the lack of many a thing I sought, And with old woes new wail my dear time's waste: 
 Then can I drown an eye, unused to flow, For precious friends hid in death's dateless night, And weep afresh love's long since cancell'd woe, And moan the expense of many a vanish'd sight: 
 Then can I grieve at grievances foregone, And heavily from woe to woe tell o'er The sad account of fore-bemoaned moan, Which I new pay as if not paid before. 
 But if the while I think on thee, dear friend, All losses are restored and sorrows end. 
 
 
 30.
 Когда взволнованный красивой думой, Тревожу тень умчавшихся времён, Вздыхаю о потерях жизни юной, И боль утрат рождает новый стон: 
 Тогда печали нет конца и края, Друзей я вспоминаю дорогих, И снова о любимых я стенаю, И плачу об утратах я своих: 
 Мне хочется на небо волком выть, И пересчёт несчастий скажет сам, Что горько мне придётся заплатить По прежде неоплаченным счетам. 
 Но дружбой нашей я теперь согретый, И все уходят горести и беды. 
 
 
 
 
 31.
 Thy bosom is endeared with all hearts, Which I by lacking have supposed dead, And there reigns love and all love's loving parts, And all those friends which I thought buried. 
 How many a holy and obsequious tear Hath dear religious love stol'n from mine eye As interest of the dead, which now appear But things removed that hidden in thee lie! 
 Thou art the grave where buried love doth live, Hung with the trophies of my lovers gone, Who all their parts of me to thee did give; That due of many now is thine alone: 
 Their images I loved I view in thee, And thou, all they, hast all the all of me. 
 
 
 31.
 В твоей груди - сердца моих друзей, Которых мёртвыми считал напрасно, В ней царствует любовь минувших дней, И живы все, кто умерли ужасно. 
 Ты знаешь, сколько слёз, святых и горьких, С любовью я пролил из моих глаз, О, скольких пережил, оплакал скольких, Но всех нашёл в груди твоей сейчас! 
 Ты - та могила, где живёт любовь, Вместилище трофейных экспонатов, Собранье мертвецов, оживших вновь; И ценностей великих и богатых: 
 Люблю твоё лицо, в нём вижу их, Они и ты - суть звуки слов моих. 
 
 
 
 
 32.
 If thou survive my well-contented day, When that churl Death my bones with dust shall cover, And shalt by fortune once more re-survey These poor rude lines of thy deceased lover, 
 Compare them with the bettering of the time, And though they be outstripp'd by every pen, Reserve them for my love, not for their rhyme, Exceeded by the height of happier men. 
 O, then vouchsafe me but this loving thought: 'Had my friend's Muse grown with this growing age, A dearer birth than this his love had brought, To march in ranks of better equipage: 
 But since he died and poets better prove, Theirs for their style I'll read, his for his love. 
 
 
 32.
 Когда мой прах забудут небеса, И кость, истлев, отдаст земле все соки, Быть может, попадутся на глаза, Тебе, мой друг, скупые эти строки, 
 И ты, сравнив их с лучшими стихами, Увидишь рифм банальный перепляс, Но знай: под пылью строк, обросших мхами, Есть нежность слов в тебя влюблённых фраз. 
 О, может быть, с улыбкой молвишь ты: "Зерно любви он сеял вместе с Музой, Взошли ростки добра и красоты, Рождённые от славного союза: 
 Теперь он умер, лучше есть поэты, Я чту их стиль, чту в нём - любви заветы". 
 
 
 
 
 33.
 Full many a glorious morning have I seen Flatter the mountain-tops with sovereign eye, Kissing with golden face the meadows green, Gilding pale streams with heavenly alchemy; 
 Anon permit the basest clouds to ride With ugly rack on his celestial face, And from the forlorn world his visage hide, Stealing unseen to west with this disgrace: 
 Even so my sun one early morn did shine With all triumphant splendor on my brow; But out, alack! he was but one hour mine; The region cloud hath mask'd him from me now. 
 Yet him for this my love no whit disdaineth; Suns of the world may stain when heaven's sun staineth. 
 
 
 33.
 Луч солнца будит запад и восток, Касаясь гор своей рукой чудесной, Луга целует, и речной поток Он золотит алхимией небесной; 
 Но скоро, смотришь, орды подлых туч Скрывают лик властителя земного, И мир несчастен, что не виден луч, Исполненный игры огня златого: 
 И я когда-то полон был огня, И солнца свет ласкал мой взор могучий; Теперь, увы! всё скрылось от меня; И надо мной теперь нависли тучи. 
 Твоя любовь, мой друг, ещё живёт; И не закрыли тучи небосвод. 
 
 
 
 
 34.
 Why didst thou promise such a beauteous day, And make me travel forth without my cloak, To let base clouds o'ertake me in my way, Hiding thy bravery in their rotten smoke? 
 'Tis not enough that through the cloud thou break, To dry the rain on my storm-beaten face, For no man well of such a salve can speak That heals the wound and cures not the disgrace: 
 Nor can thy shame give physic to my grief; Though thou repent, yet I have still the loss: The offender's sorrow lends but weak relief To him that bears the strong offence's cross. 
 Ah! but those tears are pearl which thy love sheds, And they are rich and ransom all ill deeds. 
 
 
 34.
 Зачем же, обещая ясный день, Позвал в дорогу без плаща и шляпы, И допустил, чтоб тучи злая тень Закрыла свет своей медвежьей лапой? 
 Да ладно б туча! ветер, ливень с градом Обрушились на голову мою, Чтоб стихла боль, какой бальзам мне надо, Пусть скажет тот, кто подложил свинью: 
 Пускай твой стыд излечит мою боль; Хоть ты змея, я всё ещё в надежде: Да, грубый я медведь, а не король, Но боль знакома даже и невежде. 
 А! Словно слёзы капли дождевые, Излечат и простят грехи любые. 
 
 
 
 
 35.
 No more be grieved at that which thou hast done: Roses have thorns, and silver fountains mud; Clouds and eclipses stain both moon and sun, And loathsome canker lives in sweetest bud. 
 All men make faults, and even I in this, Authorizing thy trespass with compare, Myself corrupting, salving thy amiss, Excusing thy sins more than thy sins are; 
 For to thy sensual fault I bring in sense- Thy adverse party is thy advocate- And 'gainst myself a lawful plea commence: Such civil war is in my love and hate 
 That I an accessary needs must be To that sweet thief which sourly robs from me. 
 
 
 35.
 Не будем горевать о том, что было: С шипами розы, с грязью серебро; Затмения бывают у светила, Моль портит мех и прочее добро. 
 Все ошибаются, со всеми я, Сравни мои слова, найди ошибки, Целебной мазью исцели себя, И отпусти грехи мои с улыбкой; 
 Я чувствую, что где-то ошибаюсь - Твой обвинитель я и адвокат - Сам довод привожу и отвергаю: Во мне любовь и злоба говорят, 
 Что соучастник я в проделках вора, Готового меня ограбить скоро. 
 
 
 
 
 36.
 Let me confess that we two must be twain, Although our undivided loves are one: So shall those blots that do with me remain Without thy help by me be borne alone. 
 In our two loves there is but one respect, Though in our lives a separable spite, Which though it alter not love's sole effect, Yet doth it steal sweet hours from love's delight. 
 I may not evermore acknowledge thee, Lest my bewailed guilt should do thee shame, Nor thou with public kindness honour me, Unless thou take that honour from thy name: 
 But do not so; I love thee in such sort As, thou being mine, mine is thy good report. 
 
 
 36.
 Признаюсь, что мы оба раздвоились, Хотя любовь одна у нас с тобой: Тем бедам, что со мною приключились, Ты помогаешь, добрый мой герой. 
 В нашей любви есть общее зерно И есть у каждого своя досада; Она беснуется, взрастая, но Задуть не в силах огнь твоей лампады. 
 Я не могу всегда с тобою быть, Как ни стремился б чувствами своими, Любовь, наверное, ты хочешь скрыть, Но разрушаешь собственное имя: 
 Не делай так; люблю тебя, ведь я - Есть сторона хорошая твоя. 
 
 
 
 
 37.
 As a decrepit father takes delight To see his active child do deeds of youth, So I, made lame by fortune's dearest spite, Take all my comfort of thy worth and truth. 
 For whether beauty, birth, or wealth, or wit, Or any of these all, or all, or more, Entitled in thy parts do crowned sit, I make my love engrafted to this store: 
 So then I am not lame, poor, nor despised, Whilst that this shadow doth such substance give That I in thy abundance am sufficed And by a part of all thy glory live. 
 Look, what is best, that best I wish in thee: This wish I have; then ten times happy me! 
 
 
 37.
 Как радуется старость, когда видит Энергию и подвиги детей, Так я, судьбу-злодейку ненавидя, Завидую правдивости твоей. 
 Богатый ум ли, красота ль твоя, Все вместе или взятые отдельно, Наследное богатство короля, Вот что скажу тебе, мой друг бесцельный: 
 Я не завистник, не бедняк, не шут, Я дух и тень, в эфире обитаю, Но я твоё наследство берегу И будущую славу разделяю. 
 Храню твой клад, возьми его обратно: И счастлив буду я десятикратно! 
 
 
 
 
 38.
 How can my Muse want subject to invent, While thou dost breathe, that pour'st into my verse Thine own sweet argument, too excellent For every vulgar paper to rehearse? 
 O, give thyself the thanks, if aught in me Worthy perusal stand against thy sight; For who's so dumb that cannot write to thee, When thou thyself dost give invention light? 
 Be thou the tenth Muse, ten times more in worth Than those old nine which rhymers invocate; And he that calls on thee, let him bring forth Eternal numbers to outlive long date. 
 If my slight Muse do please these curious days, The pain be mine, but thine shall be the praise. 
 
 
 38.
 Как может Муза выдумать сюжет, Пока ты дышишь, льётся слог сонета, Но будет ли прекрасным его цвет, Размноженный бульварною газетой? 
 Благодари себя за странность слова, Коль буквы режут благородный взгляд; Когда же ты поймёшь письмо немого, Крик тихих знаков, пятен светлый ряд? 
 Десятой Музой будь, и девять старых Сонетом превзойди в десятки раз; И пусть твой звук возносится к Стожарам, Высокий, вечный, чистый как алмаз. 
 Пусть Музы пропоют его на бис, Я огорчусь, а ты получишь приз. 
 
 
 
 
 39.
 O, how thy worth with manners may I sing, When thou art all the better part of me? What can mine own praise to mine own self bring? And what is 't but mine own when I praise thee? 
 Even for this let us divided live, And our dear love lose name of single one, That by this separation I may give That due to thee which thou deservest alone. 
 O absence, what a torment wouldst thou prove, Were it not thy sour leisure gave sweet leave To entertain the time with thoughts of love, Which time and thoughts so sweetly doth deceive, 
 And that thou teachest how to make one twain, By praising him here who doth hence remain! 
 
 
 39.
 Какую песнь пропеть тебе в награду, Когда ты часть меня же самого? Сложу ли я прекрасную руладу? Достойную вниманья твоего? 
 Наверно, нам раздельно надо жить, И имена забудем мы друг друга, Тогда смогу как надо восхвалить Твоих достоинств ценные заслуги. 
 Разлука! изведи мученьем лютым, Досуг тоскливый услади опять, Чтоб время угостить приятным блюдом, Дабы его немножко скоротать, 
 И чтоб ты понял, можно ль раздвоиться, Чтоб наградить того, кто прочь умчится! 
 
 
 
 
 40.
 Take all my loves, my love, yea, take them all; What hast thou then more than thou hadst before? No love, my love, that thou mayst true love call; All mine was thine before thou hadst this more. 
 Then if for my love thou my love receivest, I cannot blame thee for my love thou usest; But yet be blamed, if thou thyself deceivest By wilful taste of what thyself refusest. 
 I do forgive thy robbery, gentle thief, Although thou steal thee all my poverty; And yet, love knows, it is a greater grief To bear love's wrong than hate's known injury. 
 Lascivious grace, in whom all ill well shows, Kill me with spites; yet we must not be foes. 
 
 
 40.
 Возьми мою любовь, да! всю возьми; Любовь моя, ты больше или меньше? Не исчерпать её, как ни стремись; В тебе живёт любовь мужчин и женщин. 
 Не упрекну тебя, когда с любовью Используешь любовь, весь мир любя; Но горе, если, движимый злословьем, Вкусив её, отвергнешь от себя. 
 Прощаю воровство своих соседей, Хотя забрал ты всё, чем я владел; Отныне же, клянусь, любовь медведя Ужасней самых чёрных, грязных дел. 
 Мой светлый, добрый принц и лютый зверь, Убей меня; мы не враги теперь. 
 
 
 
 
 41.
 Those petty wrongs that liberty commits, When I am sometime absent from thy heart, Thy beauty and thy years full well befits, For still temptation follows where thou art. 
 Gentle thou art and therefore to be won, Beauteous thou art, therefore to be assailed; And when a woman woos, what woman's son Will sourly leave her till she have prevailed? 
 Ay me! but yet thou mightest my seat forbear, And chide thy beauty and thy straying youth, Who lead thee in their riot even there Where thou art forced to break a twofold truth, 
 Hers by thy beauty tempting her to thee, Thine, by thy beauty being false to me. 
 
 
 41.
 Ошибки, совершенные свободой, Желающей забыть учебный бред, Вполне понятны в молодые годы, Играют силы, и манит запрет. 
 Ты молод, и запрету уступаешь, Красивый, и поэтому грешишь; Но разве сердце женское не знаешь? Ему всё мало, что не совершишь. 
 Твоя энергия меня тревожит, И я браню шальную красоту, Что, обещая счастие умножить, Обманет и убьёт твою мечту, 
 Испытывает правду красота, Но ложь - её природная черта. 
 
 
 
 
 42.
 That thou hast her, it is not all my grief, And yet it may be said I loved her dearly; That she hath thee, is of my wailing chief, A loss in love that touches me more nearly. 
 Loving offenders, thus I will excuse ye: Thou dost love her, because thou knowst I love her; And for my sake even so doth she abuse me, Suffering my friend for my sake to approve her. 
 If I lose thee, my loss is my love's gain, And losing her, my friend hath found that loss; Both find each other, and I lose both twain, And both for my sake lay on me this cross: 
 But here's the joy; my friend and I are one; Sweet flattery! then she loves but me alone. 
 
 
 42.
 Что ты красивый, это не беда, Мне даже нравится, что ты красивый; Но вот когда смысл жизни красота, Я горько плачу и теряю силы. 
 Мой милый вор, тебя я извиняю: Её ты любишь, ибо я люблю; Меня красотка вором выставляет, А ты страдаешь за любовь мою. 
 Убив тебя, убью мою любовь, Убив её, разрушу сердце друга; Если обоим выпущу я кровь, Заноет сердце от морозной вьюги: 
 Но всё игра; и с другом я един; Выходит, красотой любим один. 
 
 
 
 
 43.
 When most I wink, then do mine eyes best see, For all the day they view things unrespected; But when I sleep, in dreams they look on thee, And darkly bright are bright in dark directed. 
 Then thou, whose shadow shadows doth make bright, How would thy shadow's form form happy show To the clear day with thy much clearer light, When to unseeing eyes thy shade shines so! 
 How would, I say, mine eyes be blessed made By looking on thee in the living day, When in dead night thy fair imperfect shade Through heavy sleep on sightless eyes doth stay! 
 All days are nights to see till I see thee, And nights bright days when dreams do show thee me. 
 
 
 43.
 Когда прищурюсь, лучше видит глаз, Неясный образ ясно различая; А если сплю, то снов цветной рассказ Опять к тебе забег свой устремляет. 
 И тень твоя, как солнце золотая, Предметов выделяет силуэт, Таким прекрасным светом освещая, Что глаз слепого видит этот свет! 
 Как счастлив тот, чьи сбудутся мечты, Кто днём узрит чудесный образ твой, Раз тень твоей небесной красоты Сквозь тень ночную видит и слепой! 
 День без тебя темнее темноты, И ночь светлее дня, коль снишься ты. 
 
 
 
 
 44.
 If the dull substance of my flesh were thought, Injurious distance should not stop my way; For then despite of space I would be brought, From limits far remote where thou dost stay. 
 No matter then although my foot did stand Upon the farthest earth removed from thee; For nimble thought can jump both sea and land As soon as think the place where he would be. 
 But ah! thought kills me that I am not thought, To leap large lengths of miles when thou art gone, But that so much of earth and water wrought I must attend time's leisure with my moan, 
 Receiving nought by elements so slow But heavy tears, badges of either's woe. 
 
 
 44.
 Ах, если б мог дух мыслью обратиться, Не знал бы остановок на пути; К тебе, презрев пространство, я б пустился, Лети, мой глупый дух, вперед лети. 
 Не одолеет плоть глухой ограды, Что сторожит покой твоих земель; Для мысли ж быстрокрылой нет преграды, Через моря и земли - прямо в цель. 
 Но! Убивает мысль, что я не мысль, И расстоянье велико до друга, И над землёю мне не пронестись, И занят мозг работой в час досуга, 
 Да, ничего мне разум не принёс, Кроме печальных знаков, горьких слёз. 
 
 
 
 
 45.
 The other two, slight air and purging fire, Are both with thee, wherever I abide; The first my thought, the other my desire, These present-absent with swift motion slide. 
 For when these quicker elements are gone In tender embassy of love to thee, My life, being made of four, with two alone Sinks down to death, oppress'd with melancholy; 
 Until life's composition be recured By those swift messengers return'd from thee, Who even but now come back again, assured Of thy fair health, recounting it to me: 
 This told, I joy; but then no longer glad, I send them back again and straight grow sad. 
 
 
 45.
 Огнь очищающий, и лёгкий ветер, В тебе живут стихии две мои; Намеренье и мысль - стихии эти, В круженье вихря быстрые огни. 
 Когда стихии быстрые послами К тебе, любовь моя, отправлю я, Оставив две другие сиротами, Разрушится единая семья; 
 Пока не в равновесье, я томлюсь, И сообщений жду от скороходов, Пусть возвратятся и уверят пусть, Что в здравье ты, и минули невзгоды: 
 Мне говорят, игра; но я не рад, Послов шлю вновь, печалясь от шарад. 
 
 
 
 
 46.
 Mine eye and heart are at a mortal war How to divide the conquest of thy sight; Mine eye my heart thy picture's sight would bar, My heart mine eye the freedom of that right. 
 My heart doth plead that thou in him dost lie- A closet never pierced with crystal eyes- But the defendant doth that plea deny And says in him thy fair appearance lies. 
 To 'cide this title is impanneled A quest of thoughts, all tenants to the heart, And by their verdict is determined The clear eye's moiety and the dear heart's part: 
 As thus; mine eye's due is thy outward part, And my heart's right thy inward love of heart. 
 
 
 46.
 Глаза и сердце битвою смертельной Добычу делят взгляда твоего; Укрылось сердце стойкою барьерной, Кроме границ не видя ничего. 
 И заявляет сердце, что ты в нём, Ничьим глазам кристальным недоступный, Но отвечает глаз, горя огнём, И отрицает оговор преступный. 
 Тогда присяжных сердце нанимает, Чтоб разобрать вопрос без плутовства, И честных мыслей суд постановляет Глазам и сердцу разделить права: 
 Итак; имеет право видеть око, Пусть сердце - любит; ныне и без срока. 
 
 
 
 
 47.
 Betwixt mine eye and heart a league is took, And each doth good turns now unto the other: When that mine eye is famish'd for a look, Or heart in love with sighs himself doth smother, 
 With my love's picture then my eye doth feast And to the painted banquet bids my heart; Another time mine eye is my heart's guest And in his thoughts of love doth share a part: 
 So, either by thy picture or my love, Thyself away art resent still with me; For thou not farther than my thoughts canst move, And I am still with them and they with thee; 
 Or, if they sleep, thy picture in my sight Awakes my heart to heart's and eye's delight. 
 
 
 47.
 Мир заключили сердце и глаза, Служить друг другу в пользе обоюдной: Коль взор однажды исказит слеза, Иль огорчится сердце мыслью трудной, 
 Пусть взор утешится картиной чудной, Пусть прочь уйдёт сердечная гроза; Гостя у сердца каждую минуту, Его любовь разделят с ним глаза: 
 Прости, любовь, нелепые затеи, Если обижу образ твой златой; Ведь ты не дальше, чем мои идеи, И с ними я ещё, они с тобой; 
 А если мысли спят, бодр стук сердечный, Вновь радуя задумкой безупречной. 
 
 
 
 
 48.
 How careful was I, when I took my way, Each trifle under truest bars to thrust, That to my use it might unused stay From hands of falsehood, in sure wards of trust! 
 But thou, to whom my jewels trifles are, Most worthy of comfort, now my greatest grief, Thou, best of dearest and mine only care, Art left the prey of every vulgar thief. 
 Thee have I not lock'd up in any chest, Save where thou art not, though I feel thou art, Within the gentle closure of my breast, From whence at pleasure thou mayst come and part; 
 And even thence thou wilt be stol'n, I fear, For truth proves thievish for a prize so dear. 
 
 
 48.
 Я осторожен был перед дорогой, И спрятал всех вещей своих запас, А схрон укрыл я тайною глубокой От лживых рук и вороватых глаз! 
 Но о тебе печалюсь, мой герой, Достойный славных слов высокопарных, Из лучших лучший попечитель мой, Что станешь жертвою воров вульгарных. 
 Я чувствую, но за семью замками Не скрыть твой образ в тайном сундуке, В моей груди огонь, и его пламя Твой свет хранит в прекрасном лепестке; 
 Боюсь, похитят пламя из груди, И умыкнут тебя, того гляди. 
 
 
 
 
 49.
 Against that time, if ever that time come, When I shall see thee frown on my defects, When as thy love hath cast his utmost sum, Call'd to that audit by advised respects; 
 Against that time when thou shalt strangely pass And scarcely greet me with that sun thine eye, When love, converted from the thing it was, Shall reasons find of settled gravity,- 
 Against that time do I ensconce me here Within the knowledge of mine own desert, And this my hand against myself uprear, To guard the lawful reasons on thy part: 
 To leave poor me thou hast the strength of laws, Since why to love I can allege no cause. 
 
 
 49.
 Если наступит день, когда увижу Твою суровость от моих грехов, Когда твою любовь я вдруг обижу Занудною нелепостью стихов; 
 Коль миг придёт, когда чужим ты станешь, И мне при встрече даже не кивнёшь, Когда любовь, которой прорастаешь, Стихи осудит и найдёт в них ложь, - 
 До той поры, я спрячусь прямо здесь, Среди барханов собственной пустыни, И пусть моя рука оставит весть, Чтоб защититься строчками живыми: 
 Оставь сонетов бедную тетрадь, Коль не дано любви мне доказать. 
 
 
 
 
 50.
 How heavy do I journey on the way, When what I seek, my weary travel's end, Doth teach that ease and that repose to say 'Thus far the miles are measured from thy friend!' 
 The beast that bears me, tired with my woe, Plods dully on, to bear that weight in me, As if by some instinct the wretch did know His rider loved not speed, being made from thee: 
 The bloody spur cannot provoke him on That sometimes anger thrusts into his hide; Which heavily he answers with a groan, More sharp to me than spurring to his side; 
 For that same groan doth put this in my mind; My grief lies onward and my joy behind. 
 
 
 50.
 Как тяжело узнать в конце пути, Устав от тщетности борьбы жестокой Что цели ты, увы, не смог найти: "По-прежнему мой друг в стране далёкой!" 
 Губитель мой, нытьём мне надоевший, Тупой работой утомил меня, Как поступает всадник озверевший, Что мучает несчастного коня: 
 Нельзя ускорить бег кровавой шпорой, Рождает гнев наездника толчок; На это конь ответит мне укором, Тем тягостней, чем больше ноет бок; 
 Запомни стон и храп коней своих; Вперёд, печаль, забавы - позади. 
 
 
 
 
 51.
 Thus can my love excuse the slow offence Of my dull bearer when from thee I speed: From where thou art why should I haste me thence? Till I return, of posting is no need. 
 O, what excuse will my poor beast then find, When swift extremity can seem but slow? Then should I spur, though mounted on the wind; In winged speed no motion shall I know: 
 Then can no horse with my desire keep pace; Therefore desire of perfect'st love being made, Shall neigh--no dull flesh--in his fiery race; But love, for love, thus shall excuse my jade; 
 Since from thee going he went wilful-slow, Towards thee I'll run, and give him leave to go. 
 
 
 51.
 Любовь простит наезднику обиды, Когда примчусь я с вестью от тебя: Зачем спешить, когда тебя я видел? Не надо, всадник, гнать, вернулся я. 
 Простить обиды, жалкая скотина, Когда твой бег улитки не быстрей? Я ветру даже исхлестал бы спину; Как стар ты стал, стремительный борей: 
 Нет скакуна, увы, чтоб вихрем мчался; Пронёс бы ураганом он меня И мощью - неземною - упивался; Прости, любовь, несносного коня; 
 Вернулся конь, не хочет бег свой скорить, Я сам к тебе пойду, не стану спорить. 
 
 
 
 
 52.
 So am I as the rich, whose blessed key Can bring him to his sweet up-locked treasure, The which he will not every hour survey, For blunting the fine point of seldom pleasure. 
 Therefore are feasts so solemn and so rare, Since, seldom coming, in the long year set, Like stones of worth they thinly placed are, Or captain jewels in the carcanet. 
 So is the time that keeps you as my chest, Or as the wardrobe which the robe doth hide, To make some special instant special blest, By new unfolding his imprison'd pride. 
 Blessed are you, whose worthiness gives scope, Being had, to triumph, being lack'd, to hope. 
 
 
 52.
 Итак, я как богач, что ключ хранит От сундуков с несметными дарами, Но, хоть игра брильянтов веселит, Не каждый час я пользуюсь ключами. 
 И оттого, что редко прихожу, Игрой любуюсь редкой, величавой, Так будни ценят карнавала шум, И ценит камень красота оправы. 
 Ты как сундук мой, временем хранимый, Или как шкаф, в котором сорок шуб, Но близок уже час неумолимый Восторженного блеска медных труб. 
 Ты счастлив широтой своих пределов, Своих триумфов и желаний смелых. 
 
 
 
 
 53.
 What is your substance, whereof are you made, That millions of strange shadows on you tend? Since every one hath, every one, one shade, And you, but one, can every shadow lend. 
 Describe Adonis, and the counterfeit Is poorly imitated after you; On Helen's cheek all art of beauty set, And you in Grecian tires are painted new: 
 Speak of the spring and foison of the year; The one doth shadow of your beauty show, The other as your bounty doth appear; And you in every blessed shape we know. 
 In all external grace you have some part, But you like none, none you, for constant heart. 
 
 
 53.
 Ты тень какой субстанции, что светом Твоей игры наполнен миллион? Ведь тень одна у каждого предмета, А ты - один, кто в каждом отражён. 
 Представь Адониса, и тенью странной Он будет имитации твоей; Елены лик, царицы чужестранной, Есть отражение твоих теней: 
 Поговорим об осени и мае; Тень прелести твоей видна в весне, И созревает в добром урожае; Мы тень твою встречаем в каждом дне. 
 Ты всех красот счастливейший венец, Твой звук в биенье лёгком всех сердец. 
 
 
 
 
 54.
 O, how much more doth beauty beauteous seem By that sweet ornament which truth doth give! The rose looks fair, but fairer we it deem For that sweet odour which doth in it live. 
 The canker-blooms have full as deep a dye As the perfumed tincture of the roses, Hang on such thorns and play as wantonly When summer's breath their masked buds discloses: 
 But, for their virtue only is their show, They live unwoo'd and unrespected fade, Die to themselves. Sweet roses do not so; Of their sweet deaths are sweetest odours made: 
 And so of you, beauteous and lovely youth, When that shall fade, my verse distills your truth. 
 
 
 54.
 Воистину, прекрасней красота В узоре правды, свежестью блистая! Красива роза, но её нектар Красивый вид прекрасно дополняет. 
 Красивый вид и сладость аромата К цветам влекут цветочного жука, И, наслаждаясь дуновеньем сада, Жучок резвится в глубине цветка: 
 Но, оттого, что увядает цвет, И век измерен каждому созданью, Жучок умрёт. Но запах розы нет; Цветочный куст хранит благоуханье: 
 Мой юный друг, так твой весёлый вид Сонет, когда увянешь, сохранит. 
 
 
 
 
 55.
 Not marble, nor the gilded monuments Of princes, shall outlive this powerful rhyme; But you shall shine more bright in these contents Than unswept stone besmear'd with sluttish time. 
 When wasteful war shall statues overturn, And broils root out the work of masonry, Nor Mars his sword nor war's quick fire shall burn The living record of your memory. 
 'Gainst death and all-oblivious enmity Shall you pace forth; your praise shall still find room Even in the eyes of all posterity That wear this world out to the ending doom. 
 So, till the judgment that yourself arise, You live in this, and dwell in lover's eyes. 
 
 
 55.
 Ни мрамору, ни камням пирамид Не пережить энергии сонета; Исчезнет позолота царских плит, Но ты играй в лучах златого света. 
 Когда война низвергнет монументы, И славу принцев уничтожит бой, Меч Марса и кровавые фрагменты, Как страшный сон, забудет род людской. 
 Но смертный хлад и неприязнь забвенья Ты избежишь; и будет образ твой В глазах людей любого поколенья, И сохранится в памяти земной. 
 До дня суда ты будешь жить в веках, Средь строк моих, и в любящих сердцах. 
 
 
 
 
 56.
 Sweet love, renew thy force; be it not said Thy edge should blunter be than appetite, Which but to-day by feeding is allay'd, To-morrow sharpen'd in his former might: 
 So, love, be thou; although to-day thou fill Thy hungry eyes even till they wink with fullness, To-morrow see again, and do not kill The spirit of love with a perpetual dullness. 
 Let this sad interim like the ocean be Which parts the shore, where two contracted new Come daily to the banks, that, when they see Return of love, more blest may be the view; 
 Else call it winter, which being full of care Makes summer's welcome thrice more wish'd, more rare. 
 
 
 56.
 Взбурли, любовь, взбурли; и с новой силой Остри металл, и аппетит умножь, Достаток дней сегодняшних унылых Пусть, кровь пуская, взрежет острый нож: 
 Так, так, любовь; ты ныне насыщаешь Обилием морщин голодный глаз, Смотри опять! ты просто убиваешь Свой вечный дух как вялый дикобраз. 
 Сегодня хмурый день, а завтра новый, И между ними - целый океан, На вёсла! в путь! и океан суровый Переплыви, отважный капитан. 
 Иначе зимний холод сменит лето, Встречай его, сбылась мечта поэта. 
 
 
 
 
 57.
 Being your slave, what should I do but tend Upon the hours and times of your desire? I have no precious time at all to spend, Nor services to do, till you require. 
 Nor dare I chide the world-without-end hour Whilst I, my sovereign, watch the clock for you, Nor think the bitterness of absence sour When you have bid your servant once adieu; 
 Nor dare I question with my jealous thought Where you may be, or your affairs suppose, But, like a sad slave, stay and think of nought Save, where you are how happy you make those. 
 So true a fool is love that in your will, Though you do any thing, he thinks no ill. 
 
 
 57.
 Я разве раб твой, чтоб ловить минуту И угождать вниманью твоему? Я трачу время на тебя, зануду, А для чего, никак я не пойму. 
 Не жалко мне бесчисленных часов, Прошедших, господин мой, в ожиданье, Слуга хороший вытерпеть готов Разлуки боль и холодность прощанья. 
 Из ревности не смею я спросить, Ты где сейчас, и с кем ведёшь сраженье, Бездельник я, я не могу продлить Счастливой юности твоей мгновенье. 
 Так глупая любовь, живя в неволе, Всё делает, не думая о боли. 
 
 
 
 
 58.
 That god forbid that made me first your slave, I should in thought control your times of pleasure, Or at your hand the account of hours to crave, Being your vassal, bound to stay your leisure! 
 O, let me suffer, being at your beck, The imprison'd absence of your liberty; And patience, tame to sufferance, bide each check, Without accusing you of injury. 
 Be where you list, your charter is so strong That you yourself may privilege your time To what you will; to you it doth belong Yourself to pardon of self-doing crime. 
 I am to wait, though waiting so be hell; Not blame your pleasure, be it ill or well. 
 
 
 58.
 Как твой слуга, твой раб и твой вассал, Готов я ждать часы, недели, годы, И, как бы я при этом не страдал, Не преступлю границ твоей свободы! 
 По милости твоей, позволь страдать, И стражников позволь убить, проклятых; И терпеливо каждый чек принять, Без обвинения тебя в растратах. 
 Свобод и прав святое ассорти Я не нарушу ропотом глумленья, Что хочешь делай; сам себя прости За мерзость своего грехопаденья. 
 Хоть ожиданья адом я томим, Ты волен, быть здоровым иль больным. 
 
 
 
 
 59.
 If there be nothing new, but that which is Hath been before, how are our brains beguiled, Which, labouring for invention, bear amiss The second burden of a former child! 
 O, that record could with a backward look, Even of five hundred courses of the sun, Show me your image in some antique book, Since mind at first in character was done! 
 That I might see what the old world could say To this composed wonder of your frame; Whether we are mended, or whether better they, Or whether revolution be the same. 
 O, sure I am, the wits of former days To subjects worse have given admiring praise. 
 
 
 59.
 Что было раньше, может повториться, Через минуту, или век спустя, Нас согревает мысль, что возродится В медвежьей шкуре прежнее дитя! 
 Припоминаю, лет пятьсот назад Я видел образ твой в античной книге, Мой юный друг, увидеть вновь я рад Его черты в твоём прекрасном лике! 
 Вновь старый мир по старому лекалу Тебя создал, иль это только сон; Ты прежний? лучше? верить ли зерцалу? Иль повернулось жизни колесо? 
 О, я уверен, разум прежних дней Явил не худший свет своих теней. 
 
 
 
 
 60.
 Like as the waves make towards the pebbled shore, So do our minutes hasten to their end; Each changing place with that which goes before, In sequent toil all forwards do contend. 
 Nativity, once in the main of light, Crawls to maturity, wherewith being crown'd, Crooked elipses 'gainst his glory fight, And Time that gave doth now his gift confound. 
 Time doth transfix the flourish set on youth And delves the parallels in beauty's brow, Feeds on the rarities of nature's truth, And nothing stands but for his scythe to mow: 
 And yet to times in hope my verse shall stand, Praising thy worth, despite his cruel hand. 
 
 
 60.
 Волнам подобно, что о камень бьются, Спешат минуты к своему концу; В боренье к гибели они несутся На смену побеждённому борцу. 
 Рождаясь слабым, вскоре вырастая, И, превращаясь в храброго бойца, С судьбою гордый воин в бой вступает, Но поражает Время гордеца. 
 Так косит Время юные соцветья, И красоте наносится ущерб, И длится жатва годы и столетья, И не остановить жестокий серп: 
 Но я надеюсь рифмою живою Сберечь тебя, чтоб мир не взвыл вдовою. 
 
 
 
 
 61.
 Is it thy will thy image should keep open My heavy eyelids to the weary night? Dost thou desire my slumbers should be broken, While shadows like to thee do mock my sight? 
 Is it thy spirit that thou send'st from thee So far from home into my deeds to pry, To find out shames and idle hours in me, The scope and tenor of thy jealousy? 
 O, no! thy love, though much, is not so great: It is my love that keeps mine eye awake; Mine own true love that doth my rest defeat, To play the watchman ever for thy sake: 
 For thee watch I whilst thou dost wake elsewhere, From me far off, with others all too near. 
 
 
 61.
 О, разве ты глаза мне открываешь, Холодной ночью мучая меня? И разве ты дремоту прерываешь, Своею тенью бедный взор дразня? 
 И твой ли дух из дальнего пространства Тобою послан, чтоб следить за мной, Постыдной лени уличить жеманство, Ревнивый стражник и хранитель твой? 
 О, нет! хоть велика твоя любовь: Но не она мне веки открывает; Моя любовь, моя, бурлит мне кровь, Тебя ночной порою охраняет: 
 На страже я, пока ты бодрым взглядом В стране далёкой, но с другими рядом. 
 
 
 
 
 62.
 Sin of self-love possesseth all mine eye And all my soul and all my every part; And for this sin there is no remedy, It is so grounded inward in my heart. 
 Methinks no face so gracious is as mine, No shape so true, no truth of such account; And for myself mine own worth do define, As I all other in all worths surmount. 
 But when my glass shows me myself indeed, Beated and chopp'd with tann'd antiquity, Mine own self-love quite contrary I read; Self so self-loving were iniquity. 
 'Tis thee, myself, that for myself I praise, Painting my age with beauty of thy days. 
 
 
 62.
 В своих глазах, в душе и клеткой каждой Исполнен я грехом любви к себе; Ищу лекарство, исцелится жажду, Но вторит сердце сладкой похвальбе. 
 Я полагаю, что прекрасней всех, Всех лучше, совершенней, благородней; И больше всех я заслужил успех, Поскольку всех людей я превосходней. 
 Но в зеркале встречаю двойника, Похожего на древнего долдона, И я готов намять ему бока; За то, что завладел мной незаконно. 
 Так вот кого хвалю до хрипоты, Свой слепок, кальку с древней красоты. 
 
 
 
 
 63.
 Against my love shall be, as I am now, With Time's injurious hand crush'd and o'er-worn; When hours have drain'd his blood and fill'd his brow With lines and wrinkles; when his youthful morn 
 Hath travell'd on to age's steepy night, And all those beauties whereof now he's king Are vanishing or vanish'd out of sight, Stealing away the treasure of his spring; 
 For such a time do I now fortify Against confounding age's cruel knife, That he shall never cut from memory My sweet love's beauty, though my lover's life: 
 His beauty shall in these black lines be seen, And they shall live, and he in them still green. 
 
 
 63.
 Я знаю, Время хваткою смертельной, Как и меня, сотрёт мою любовь; Иссушит силы холодом метельным, И глубиной морщин изрежет бровь, 
 В ночную темень юность унесётся, Исчезнут принцы золотой страны, Рукой холодной роз оно коснётся, И украдёт сокровища весны; 
 Бег Времени ужасный, быстротечный, Но защищу я слабою рукой Твой юный цвет, и в памяти навечно Впишу его короткою строкой: 
 Цвет чёрной строчки белого листка, Храни любовь зелёного цветка. 
 
 
 
 
 64.
 When I have seen by Time's fell hand defaced The rich proud cost of outworn buried age; When sometime lofty towers I see down-razed And brass eternal slave to mortal rage; 
 When I have seen the hungry ocean gain Advantage on the kingdom of the shore, And the firm soil win of the watery main, Increasing store with loss and loss with store; 
 When I have seen such interchange of state, Or state itself confounded to decay; Ruin hath taught me thus to ruminate, That Time will come and take my love away. 
 This thought is as a death, which cannot choose But weep to have that which it fears to lose. 
 
 
 64.
 Когда я вижу, Время хищной птицей Рвёт жертву, оставляя лишь рубцы; Когда я вижу, варварство глумится И в прах стирает царские дворцы; 
 Как океан голодный поглощает Волной свирепой гордость королей, И суховей в пустыню превращает Ковёр богатый солнечных полей; 
 Когда я вижу, как растёт страданье, Но убивает Время и его; Я понимаю гибельным сознаньем, Что час придёт для друга моего. 
 И эта мысль как нож, как смерть, как страх, Застывший друг с улыбкой на устах. 
 
 
 
 
 65.
 Since brass, nor stone, nor earth, nor boundless sea, But sad mortality o'er-sways their power, How with this rage shall beauty hold a plea, Whose action is no stronger than a flower? 
 O, how shall summer's honey breath hold out Against the wreckful siege of battering days, When rocks impregnable are not so stout, Nor gates of steel so strong, but Time decays? 
 O fearful meditation! where, alack, Shall Time's best jewel from Time's chest lie hid? Or what strong hand can hold his swift foot back? Or who his spoil of beauty can forbid? 
 O, none, unless this miracle have might, That in black ink my love may still shine bright. 
 
 
 65.
 Когда ни медь, ни камни, ни поток Не избегут смертельного напора, Мольбой какою, слабенький цветок, Спасти тебя от гнева злого вора? 
 О, как лугов весёлое дыханье От гибельных ударов уберечь, В броню какую хрупкое созданье От разрушенья Времени облечь? 
 Эх! взять сундук бы, запечатать пробкой, Но где мне клад от Времени укрыть? И как секретную узнаю тропку? И ценности кто сможет сохранить? 
 О, нет, химера, сказка, вздор дебила, Что цвет моей любви спасут чернила. 
 
 
 
 
 66.
 Tired with all these, for restful death I cry, As, to behold desert a beggar born, And needy nothing trimm'd in jollity, And purest faith unhappily forsworn, 
 And guilded honour shamefully misplaced, And maiden virtue rudely strumpeted, And right perfection wrongfully disgraced, And strength by limping sway disabled, 
 And art made tongue-tied by authority, And folly doctor-like controlling skill, And simple truth miscall'd simplicity, And captive good attending captain ill: 
 Tired with all these, from these would I be gone, Save that, to die, I leave my love alone. 
 
 
 66.
 До смерти надоел своим сонетом, Я вижу оборванца нищету, И клоуна весёлые куплеты, И чистой веры злую клевету, 
 И чести неуместное глумленье, И надругательство над красотой, И совершенств обидные склоненья, И резвость бега лошади хромой, 
 И ищущую славу бесталанность, И глупостей назойливую вязь, И пошлых истин дивную жеманность, И свежесть, грубо втоптанную в грязь. 
 Смертельно надоел мне твой сонет, Умри хранимая любовь во мне. 
 
 
 
 
 67.
 Ah! wherefore with infection should he live, And with his presence grace impiety, That sin by him advantage should achieve And lace itself with his society? 
 Why should false painting imitate his cheek And steal dead seeing of his living hue? Why should poor beauty indirectly seek Roses of shadow, since his rose is true? 
 Why should he live, now Nature bankrupt is, Beggar'd of blood to blush through lively veins? For she hath no excheckr now but his, And, proud of many, lives upon his gains. 
 O, him she stores, to show what wealth she had In days long since, before these last so bad. 
 
 
 67.
 Ах! почему заразное сомненье В изящной голове нашло приют, Зачем внимать греховным устремленьям, Которые нас к гибели влекут? 
 Зачем румянец вору и нахалу, Чей цвет угас в поддельной суете? Зачем он ищет тень и путь к финалу, А не стремится к собственной мечте? 
 Зачем живёт, Природу разоряя, В стыде красивых и румяных щёк? Она его украсила, лентяя, А он, надменный, ею пренебрёг. 
 Хранит его затем природа-мать, Чтоб мудрое терпенье показать. 
 
 
 
 
 68.
 Thus is his cheek the map of days outworn, When beauty lived and died as flowers do now, Before the bastard signs of fair were born, Or durst inhabit on a living brow; 
 Before the golden tresses of the dead, The right of sepulchres, were shorn away, To live a second life on second head; Ere beauty's dead fleece made another gay: 
 In him those holy antique hours are seen, Without all ornament, itself and true, Making no summer of another's green, Robbing no old to dress his beauty new; 
 And him as for a map doth Nature store, To show false Art what beauty was of yore. 
 
 
 68.
 В его румянце отпечатан след, Остаток жизни умерщвлённой розы, Знак красоты, царившей много лет, Покоя узурпатора угрозы. 
 Златые локоны его главы Живут вторично, и права украли У насыпи могильной и травы; Ибо других красавцев украшали: 
 Себе забрал он древние одежды, Поправ их правду, святость, высоту. А что взамен? и так живёт, невежда, Обряженный в чужую красоту; 
 Природа в назидание хранит Пример античный и фальшивый вид. 
 
 
 
 
 69.
 Those parts of thee that the world's eye doth view Want nothing that the thought of hearts can mend; All tongues, the voice of souls, give thee that due, Uttering bare truth, even so as foes commend. 
 Thy outward thus with outward praise is crown'd; But those same tongues that give thee so thine own In other accents do this praise confound By seeing farther than the eye hath shown. 
 They look into the beauty of thy mind, And that, in guess, they measure by thy deeds; Then, churls, their thoughts, although their eyes were kind, To thy fair flower add the rank smell of weeds: 
 But why thy odour matcheth not thy show, The solve is this, that thou dost common grow. 
 
 
 69.
 Во внешности, что миру ты являешь, Изъяна нет, и нет ни в чём грехов; Все честно скажут, что ты вызываешь Восторг друзей и похвалу врагов. 
 Увенчан внешне внешнею хвалою; Но точно также те же языки Забудут образ твой, покрытый мглою, Лишь только отнесут тебе венки. 
 О человеке судят по делам, И их же добрым словом вспоминают; Для сорных трав не курят фимиам, Ибо ужасный запах источают: 
 Так ли хорош твой запах, как и вид, Подумай, изменись и удиви. 
 
 
 
 
 70.
 That thou art blamed shall not be thy defect, For slander's mark was ever yet the fair; The ornament of beauty is suspect, A crow that flies in heaven's sweetest air. 
 So thou be good, slander doth but approve Thy worth the greater, being woo'd of time; For canker vice the sweetest buds doth love, And thou present'st a pure unstained prime. 
 Thou hast pass'd by the ambush of young days, Either not assail'd or victor being charged; Yet this thy praise cannot be so thy praise, To tie up envy evermore enlarged: 
 If some suspect of ill mask'd not thy show, Then thou alone kingdoms of hearts shouldst owe. 
 
 
 70.
 Не презирай сонета отрицаньем, Злословие - есть спутник красоты; Орнаменту показано вниманье, Вороний знак на фоне высоты. 
 Хороший критик милым одобреньем Возносит выше прелести твои; Жучок цветку окажет предпочтенье, Но не сгубить дыхание любви. 
 Сидя на печке юности прелестной, Бранить нетрудно и вести войну; Но грош цена виктории чудесной, Что, множа зависть, губит глубину: 
 Слепой мой критик, буду рад сердечно, Когда ты сбросишь свой наряд увечный. 
 
 
 
 
 71.
 No longer mourn for me when I am dead Then you shall hear the surly sullen bell Give warning to the world that I am fled From this vile world, with vilest worms to dwell: 
 Nay, if you read this line, remember not The hand that writ it; for I love you so That I in your sweet thoughts would be forgot If thinking on me then should make you woe. 
 O, if, I say, you look upon this verse When I perhaps compounded am with clay, Do not so much as my poor name rehearse. But let your love even with my life decay, 
 Lest the wise world should look into your moan And mock you with me after I am gone. 
 
 
 71.
 Не убивайся сильно обо мне, Когда услышишь колокол гнетущий, Что сообщит зловещей тишине Об отроке, среди червей живущем. 
 Когда прочтёшь письмо, не вспоминай Руки, что написала эти строки, Печалью растревожить невзначай Мне не хотелось бы твой ум жестокий. 
 О, если ты увидишь слабый стих, Соединённый с холодом могильным, Не обо мне вздохни, а о живых, О, светлый друг мой, правильный и сильный, 
 Пусть мудрый мир не видит вопль твой, Когда уйду, посмейся надо мной. 
 
 
 
 
 72.
 O, lest the world should task you to recite What merit lived in me, that you should love After my death, dear love, forget me quite, For you in me can nothing worthy prove; 
 Unless you would devise some virtuous lie, To do more for me than mine own desert, And hang more praise upon deceased I Than niggard truth would willingly impart: 
 O, lest your true love may seem false in this, That you for love speak well of me untrue, My name be buried where my body is, And live no more to shame nor me nor you. 
 For I am shamed by that which I bring forth, And so should you, to love things nothing worth. 
 
 
 72.
 О, не призвал бы мир тебя к ответу, Что с недостойным вёл беседу ты, Забудь мои ущербные приметы, Скорей забудь ничтожные черты; 
 Лишь в просьбе малой, свет неугасимый, Не откажи, когда придёт конец, Пускай моё низвергнутое имя Послужит лучше, чем его скупец: 
 Чтоб свет твоей любви моею ложью Не запятнать неправдою его, Пусть имя будет там, где прах ничтожный, И не тревожит стыд мой никого. 
 Раз этот стыд написан для меня, То сделай так, во всём меня виня. 
 
 
 
 
 73.
 That time of year thou mayst in me behold When yellow leaves, or none, or few, do hang Upon those boughs which shake against the cold, Bare ruin'd choirs, where late the sweet birds sang. 
 In me thou seest the twilight of such day As after sunset fadeth in the west, Which by and by black night doth take away, Death's second self, that seals up all in rest. 
 In me thou see'st the glowing of such fire That on the ashes of his youth doth lie, As the death-bed whereon it must expire Consumed with that which it was nourish'd by. 
 This thou perceivest, which makes thy love more strong, To love that well which thou must leave ere long. 
 
 
 73.
 Ты видишь, я как осень, что роняет Негодный лист и оголяет сук, Пред холодом их тысячи слетают, Хоть раньше слышался в них птичий звук. 
 Во мне неясность сумрачного дня, В котором солнце клонится к закату, И с высоты край ночи вижу я, Что припечатает вас всех, ребята. 
 Во мне ты видишь пепел и золу, Что в юности нам сердце обжигают, Которых сердце превратит во мглу, То потребляя, что его питает. 
 Подумай, стань сильней, любовь твоя Прекрасна искрой твоего огня. 
 
 
 
 
 74.
 But be contented: when that fell arrest Without all bail shall carry me away, My life hath in this line some interest, Which for memorial still with thee shall stay. 
 When thou reviewest this, thou dost review The very part was consecrate to thee: The earth can have but earth, which is his due; My spirit is thine, the better part of me: 
 So then thou hast but lost the dregs of life, The prey of worms, my body being dead, The coward conquest of a wretch's knife, Too base of thee to be remembered. 
 The worth of that is that which it contains, And that is this, and this with thee remains. 
 
 
 74.
 Но будь доволен: на горе крутой Оставлен без защиты в шкуре зверя Затем, что интересны мне, друг мой, Достоинства твои, твои потери. 
 Когда увидишь снова эти строки, Тебе их силу посвящаю я: Земле земные отдаём мы соки; В тебе - мой дух, часть лучшая моя: 
 И ты тогда разрушишь племя трусов, Червей могильных, завладевших мной, Молитвой подлою своих укусов Глумящихся над памятью живой. 
 Цена сонета - в звуках красоты, Она - в тебе, и в ней пребудешь ты. 
 
 
 
 
 75.
 So are you to my thoughts as food to life, Or as sweet-season'd showers are to the ground; And for the peace of you I hold such strife As 'twixt a miser and his wealth is found; 
 Now proud as an enjoyer and anon Doubting the filching age will steal his treasure, Now counting best to be with you alone, Then better'd that the world may see my pleasure; 
 Sometime all full with feasting on your sight And by and by clean starved for a look; Possessing or pursuing no delight, Save what is had or must from you be took. 
 Thus do I pine and surfeit day by day, Or gluttoning on all, or all away. 
 
 
 75.
 Для мысли ты, как пища - для живущих; Как почва благодатная - для роз. И как скупец забывчивый, ведущий Войну за то, чтоб вылечить склероз; 
 Вдруг от веселья бурного к обрыву С лицом суровым устремляешь путь, То втопчешь в грязь чудесные порывы, То радость встречи переполнит грудь; 
 То угостишь роскошным ярким светом, То не дождаться слабого луча; Что ложь, что правда, удостой ответом, Какая радость в смехе палача. 
 По горло сыт я, хоть давно не ем, Иль накорми, или уйди совсем. 
 
 
 
 
 76.
 Why is my verse so barren of new pride, So far from variation or quick change? Why with the time do I not glance aside To new-found methods and to compounds strange? 
 Why write I still all one, ever the same, And keep invention in a noted weed, That every word doth almost tell my name, Showing their birth and where they did proceed? 
 O, know, sweet love, I always write of you, And you and love are still my argument; So all my best is dressing old words new, Spending again what is already spent: 
 For as the sun is daily new and old, So is my love still telling what is told. 
 
 
 76.
 Зачем я пышной вязью слов тупых Пытаюсь отдалённое приблизить? И почему, блеснув, мой странный стих Высокое старается унизить? 
 Зачем пишу и вечно трачу силы На сорняков затейливый узор, Раз выдаёт их сорный вид унылый Их автора и авторский позор? 
 О, знаю, знаю, знаю, для тебя Пишу стихи я нежно и с любовью; Исправлюсь я, во всём тебя любя, И платье старых слов покрою новью: 
 Как солнце каждый день сияет вновь, Да будет свет иной у старых слов. 
 
 
 
 
 77.
 Thy glass will show thee how thy beauties wear, Thy dial how thy precious minutes waste; The vacant leaves thy mind's imprint will bear, And of this book this learning mayst thou taste. 
 The wrinkles which thy glass will truly show Of mouthed graves will give thee memory; Thou by thy dial's shady stealth mayst know Time's thievish progress to eternity. 
 Look, what thy memory can not contain Commit to these waste blanks, and thou shalt find Those children nursed, deliver'd from thy brain, To take a new acquaintance of thy mind. 
 These offices, so oft as thou wilt look, Shall profit thee and much enrich thy book. 
 
 
 77.
 Покажет зеркало осенний сад, Часы покажут снежную пустыню, Опавший лист покажет медвежат, А буквы книги собственное имя. 
 Из зазеркалья вылезший нахал Покажет вход в подземные палаты, А сколько ты у вечности украл Покажет Время тенью циферблата. 
 Не может память долго удержать Просторных мыслей, ищет повитуху, Чтоб мир увидел милых медвежат, И плач услышал их, приятный слуху. 
 Чем чаще станешь взгляд обогащать, Тем лучше эта бедная тетрадь. 
 
 
 
 
 78.
 So oft have I invoked thee for my Muse And found such fair assistance in my verse As every alien pen hath got my use And under thee their poesy disperse. 
 Thine eyes that taught the dumb on high to sing And heavy ignorance aloft to fly Have added feathers to the learned's wing And given grace a double majesty. 
 Yet be most proud of that which I compile, Whose influence is thine and born of thee: In others' works thou dost but mend the style, And arts with thy sweet graces graced be; 
 But thou art all my art and dost advance As high as learning my rude ignorance. 
 
 
 78.
 Как часто звал тебя я, моя Муза, И помощь находил мой бедный стих, Перо чужое, сбросив ложность груза, Вмиг выводило контур слов живых. 
 Немой мой голос пенью обучала, И в высоту невежество звала, И мглу ночную светом озаряла, И награждала крыльями орла. 
 Мне радостно с тобою, принц, идти, И наблюдать красот твоих рожденье: Ты сможешь многое, улучши стиль, Свяжи стихи со смелым откровеньем; 
 Всех превзойди, стань славен и велик И научись не слушать слов моих. 
 
 
 
 
 79.
 Whilst I alone did call upon thy aid, My verse alone had all thy gentle grace, But now my gracious numbers are decay'd And my sick Muse doth give another place. 
 I grant, sweet love, thy lovely argument Deserves the travail of a worthier pen, Yet what of thee thy poet doth invent He robs thee of and pays it thee again. 
 He lends thee virtue and he stole that word From thy behavior; beauty doth he give And found it in thy cheek; he can afford No praise to thee but what in thee doth live. 
 Then thank him not for that which he doth say, Since what he owes thee thou thyself dost pay. 
 
 
 79.
 Пока один я помощь призывал, То пела рифма в дивном озаренье, Но всё прошло, разрушилось, финал, И изменилась Муза в пресыщенье. 
 Мой светлый принц, возьми моё перо, Прими его достойною рукою, И искажённых строчек серебро Перепиши великою строкою. 
 Отмсти ему за гадкие слова; Твоих достоинств дерзкое топтанье; Оно не прибавляет мастерства, Но может дать позор или признанье. 
 Но благодарных слов не говори, Останови мгновенье, раз, два, три. 
 
 
 
 
 80.
 O, how I faint when I of you do write, Knowing a better spirit doth use your name, And in the praise thereof spends all his might, To make me tongue-tied, speaking of your fame! 
 But since your worth, wide as the ocean is, The humble as the proudest sail doth bear, My saucy bark inferior far to his On your broad main doth wilfully appear. 
 Your shallowest help will hold me up afloat, Whilst he upon your soundless deep doth ride; Or being wreck'd, I am a worthless boat, He of tall building and of goodly pride: 
 Then if he thrive and I be cast away, The worst was this; my love was my decay. 
 
 
 80.
 О, дух всесильный, за моё глумленье Молчанием наказан добрый брат, Не слышно больше стройных звуков пенье, О, как же я, несчастный, виноват! 
 Как океан бескрайний был талант, А я медведь в заносчивой гримасе, Ничтожный и упрямый дилетант, Дерзнувший плыть на маленьком баркасе. 
 Пока спокоен океан огромный, Баркас качает мелкая волна, А отплыву, погибнет он, никчёмный, Построенный на верфях хвастуна: 
 Мне не обидно, что погиб баркас, Обидно то, что друга я не спас. 
 
 
 
 
 81.
 Or I shall live your epitaph to make, Or you survive when I in earth am rotten; From hence your memory death cannot take, Although in me each part will be forgotten. 
 Your name from hence immortal life shall have, Though I, once gone, to all the world must die: The earth can yield me but a common grave, When you entombed in men's eyes shall lie. 
 Your monument shall be my gentle verse, Which eyes not yet created shall o'er-read, And tongues to be your being shall rehearse When all the breathers of this world are dead; 
 You still shall live - such virtue hath my pen - Where breath most breathes, even in the mouths of men. 
 
 
 81.
 Твоей ли эпитафией я буду, Иль ты переживёшь гнилую плоть; И если вспомнит мир меня, зануду, То как Иуды мерзкого щепоть. 
 Ты в каждом добром сердце будешь светом, Хотя не мне об этом говорить: Пускай могила будет мне запретом, Но добрый свет твой должен дальше жить. 
 В моих послушных строчках твоя память, Пусть прочитает не рождённый глаз, Пусть языка коснётся твоё пламя, Когда забудет мир ничтожных нас; 
 Ты будешь жить - пишу рукой презренной - В дыханье каждом, мерзком и блаженном. 
 
 
 
 
 82.
 I grant thou wert not married to my Muse And therefore mayst without attaint o'erlook The dedicated words which writers use Of their fair subject, blessing every book 
 Thou art as fair in knowledge as in hue, Finding thy worth a limit past my praise, And therefore art enforced to seek anew Some fresher stamp of the time-bettering days 
 And do so, love; yet when they have devised What strained touches rhetoric can lend, Thou truly fair wert truly sympathized In true plain words by thy true-telling friend; 
 And their gross painting might be better used Where cheeks need blood; in thee it is abused. 
 
 
 82.
 У каждого свой путь, свои свершенья, И было бы бесчестьем бросить взор На образцы прекраснейших творений, Украсть их свет, их славу иль позор, 
 Его стихов прекрасная печать Как вызов моим прежним восхваленьям, И потому, я должен отыскать Пути иные к новым восхожденьям, 
 Смелей, любовь; у ритора и друга Послушны были дружные слова, Играли в натяжении упругом, Переливаясь искрой озорства; 
 И на щеках чертили кровью знак, Знак красной розы; ты не сможешь так. 
 
 
 
 
 83.
 I never saw that you did painting need And therefore to your fair no painting set; I found, or thought I found, you did exceed The barren tender of a poet's debt; 
 And therefore have I slept in your report, That you yourself being extant well might show How far a modern quill doth come too short, Speaking of worth, what worth in you doth grow. 
 This silence for my sin you did impute, Which shall be most my glory, being dumb; For I impair not beauty being mute, When others would give life and bring a tomb. 
 There lives more life in one of your fair eyes Than both your poets can in praise devise. 
 
 
 83.
 Как обжигает красной розы цвет, Шипы, вонзаясь, длят мои мученья; Преувеличил, думал я, поэт Пустого слова бедное значенье; 
 И потому виной мой сонный глаз, Который ты будил чудесной силой, Но ощетинил иглы дикобраз, И замолчал прекрасный голос, милый. 
 Немой мой грех причина немоты, Так пусть она во славе воссияет; Замолкну я, губитель красоты, Пусть жизнь вокруг бурлит и умирает. 
 В глазах поэтов ты живёшь прекрасно, А ты умолкни, голос мой несчастный. 
 
 
 
 
 84.
 Who is it that says most? which can say more Than this rich praise, that you alone are you? In whose confine immured is the store Which should example where your equal grew. 
 Lean penury within that pen doth dwell That to his subject lends not some small glory; But he that writes of you, if he can tell That you are you, so dignifies his story, 
 Let him but copy what in you is writ, Not making worse what nature made so clear, And such a counterpart shall fame his wit, Making his style admired every where. 
 You to your beauteous blessings add a curse, Being fond on praise, which makes your praises worse. 
 
 
 84.
 Кто больше говорит? что скажет он, Сверх слов пустых пустого самохвала? А тот, кто внутрь темницы заключён, Всех лучше знает темноту подвала. 
 Чернила из чернильницы худой Нам могут сообщить о славе мира; Но сможет ли рассказчик неплохой, Не приукрасив красоты кумира, 
 Нам передать достоинства его, Не хуже, чем природа сотворила, Превознося героя своего, Портрет рисуя истины и силы. 
 Ты, упиваясь прелестью стенанья, Хвалу возносишь собственным страданьям. 
 
 
 
 
 85.
 My tongue-tied Muse in manners holds her still, While comments of your praise, richly compiled, Reserve their character with golden quill And precious phrase by all the Muses filed. 
 I think good thoughts whilst other write good words, And like unletter'd clerk still cry 'Amen' To every hymn that able spirit affords In polish'd form of well-refined pen. 
 Hearing you praised, I say ''Tis so, 'tis true,' And to the most of praise add something more; But that is in my thought, whose love to you, Though words come hindmost, holds his rank before. 
 Then others for the breath of words respect, Me for my dumb thoughts, speaking in effect. 
 
 
 85.
 Язык, язык, о, бедный мой язык, Ты повторяешь только мысли умных, Златые мысли славных добрых книг, И озарения мгновений лунных. 
 Чужие мысли, вереницей мысли, Я точно клерк, я поп, я попугай, Чужие гимны душу мне изгрызли, И слов чужих снимаю урожай. 
 Ты говоришь, я головой киваю, Вновь восхищённый мудростью твоей; Моя любовь слова перегоняет, Слова отстали от любви моей. 
 Моей любви спасибо говорю, В слова облекшую любовь мою. 
 
 
 
 
 86.
 Was it the proud full sail of his great verse, Bound for the prize of all too precious you, That did my ripe thoughts in my brain inhearse, Making their tomb the womb wherein they grew? 
 Was it his spirit, by spirits taught to write Above a mortal pitch, that struck me dead? No, neither he, nor his compeers by night Giving him aid, my verse astonished. 
 He, nor that affable familiar ghost Which nightly gulls him with intelligence As victors of my silence cannot boast; I was not sick of any fear from thence: 
 But when your countenance fill'd up his line, Then lack'd I matter; that enfeebled mine. 
 
 
 86.
 Его ли гордый бриг под парусами Стихией слов переполнял главу, Чтоб ветер мыслей воспарил над нами И превратился, умирая, в звук? 
 Его ли дух дыханьем океана Парить учил упрямое перо? О, нет, учил сонет игрой тумана, А не помощник твой и мощь ветров. 
 Сонет, а не твой гость ночным сияньем, К которому мой глупый глаз привык, Сорвал завесу моего молчанья; Не страхом боли болен был язык: 
 Я одобрения стихов не жду; Не осуди хвалой на немоту. 
 
 
 
 
 87.
 Farewell! thou art too dear for my possessing, And like enough thou know'st thy estimate: The charter of thy worth gives thee releasing; My bonds in thee are all determinate. 
 For how do I hold thee but by thy granting? And for that riches where is my deserving? The cause of this fair gift in me is wanting, And so my patent back again is swerving. 
 Thyself thou gavest, thy own worth then not knowing, Or me, to whom thou gavest it, else mistaking; So thy great gift, upon misprision growing, Comes home again, on better judgment making. 
 Thus have I had thee, as a dream doth flatter, In sleep a king, but waking no such matter. 
 
 
 87.
 Прощай! ты дорог мне и нет преграды, Способной удержать могучий дух: Узнай, что цепи рабские разъяты; Иди, куда влечёт свободный слух. 
 К чему держать мне в крепости тебя? Чтоб сильным стал ты, не моё ль желанье? Свободы путь - есть верная стезя, Любой другой - напрасное скитанье. 
 Что ты даёшь, ты сам того не знаешь, Но знаю я, свет истины твоей; Зерно любви, которым прорастаешь, Вернёт мне радость юных моих дней. 
 Ты видел сон: зверей, царей, рабынь; Проснись, король! оцепененье скинь. 
 
 
 
 
 88.
 When thou shalt be disposed to set me light, And place my merit in the eye of scorn, Upon thy side against myself I'll fight, And prove thee virtuous, though thou art forsworn. 
 With mine own weakness being best acquainted, Upon thy part I can set down a story Of faults conceal'd, wherein I am attainted, That thou in losing me shalt win much glory: 
 And I by this will be a gainer too; For bending all my loving thoughts on thee, The injuries that to myself I do, Doing thee vantage, double-vantage me. 
 Such is my love, to thee I so belong, That for thy right myself will bear all wrong. 
 
 
 88.
 Когда исчезнет свет в моих глазах, Иль этот свет одобрит мир презренья, Я утоплю себя и их в слезах, И докажу возможность возрожденья. 
 Мне лучше всех известны их проказы, В рассказ правдивый фальш их оберну, Чтоб каждый, обнаружив ложность фразы, Смог обрести, презрев меня, триумф: 
 Но триумфатор, всё-таки, я тоже; Поскольку я любовью побеждён, Поскольку я любовью уничтожен, Согрет вдвойне целебным я огнём. 
 Ты мой учитель, я твоё творенье, Медведь, которому вернулось зренье. 
 
 
 
 
 89.
 Say that thou didst forsake me for some fault, And I will comment upon that offence; Speak of my lameness, and I straight will halt, Against thy reasons making no defence. 
 Thou canst not, love, disgrace me half so ill, To set a form upon desired change, As I'll myself disgrace: knowing thy will, I will acquaintance strangle and look strange, 
 Be absent from thy walks, and in my tongue Thy sweet beloved name no more shall dwell, Lest I, too much profane, should do it wrong And haply of our old acquaintance tell. 
 For thee against myself I'll vow debate, For I must ne'er love him whom thou dost hate. 
 
 
 89.
 Оставлен я, ошибки исправляю, Пусть обо всех расскажет верный стих, Скажи "хромой", и точно захромаю, Защиты нет от доводов твоих; 
 Бесчестием любовь не может быть, Она не потревожит сон больного, Но хочешь, я себя дам изучить, Весь тихий ужас омута чужого; 
 Когда выходит доктор из палаты, Язык влюблённый начинает бег, Как я, он счастлив донести собрату О том, что его доктор лучше всех. 
 Язык готов со мною даже спорить, Он ненавидит всех, с кем ты в раздоре. 
 
 
 
 
 90.
 Then hate me when thou wilt; if ever, now; Now, while the world is bent my deeds to cross, Join with the spite of fortune, make me bow, And do not drop in for an after-loss: 
 Ah, do not, when my heart hath 'scoped this sorrow, Come in the rearward of a conquer'd woe; Give not a windy night a rainy morrow, To linger out a purposed overthrow. 
 If thou wilt leave me, do not leave me last, When other petty griefs have done their spite But in the onset come; so shall I taste At first the very worst of fortune's might, 
 And other strains of woe, which now seem woe, Compared with loss of thee will not seem so. 
 
 
 90.
 Возненавидь меня; да, и сейчас; Пока меня земля ещё выносит, Заткни мне рот и вырви слабый глаз, И пусть злой ветер прах его уносит: 
 Ах, не входи как вор из-за спины, Когда печаль сгорит в сердечном токе; Пусть тёмной ночи грозовые сны Закончит утро в гулком водостоке. 
 Не будь последним, кто меня оставил, Когда печалей мелких злой поток Терзает плоть мою, и душу плавит, Пусть первым твой кинжал вонзится в бок, 
 Тогда печаль твою сравню с другими, И злобно надругаюсь я над ними. 
 
 
 
 
 91.
 Some glory in their birth, some in their skill, Some in their wealth, some in their bodies' force, Some in their garments, though new-fangled ill, Some in their hawks and hounds, some in their horse; 
 And every humour hath his adjunct pleasure, Wherein it finds a joy above the rest: But these particulars are not my measure; All these I better in one general best. 
 Thy love is better than high birth to me, Richer than wealth, prouder than garments' cost, Of more delight than hawks or horses be; And having thee, of all men's pride I boast: 
 Wretched in this alone, that thou mayst take All this away and me most wretched make. 
 
 
 91.
 Один рожденьем горд, другой уменьем, Богатством этот, стройным телом тот, Одеждой кто-то, кто-то увлеченьем, А кто-то псом своим безмерно горд; 
 Стремится каждый к милым развлеченьям, Найти отраду, счастье и покой; Но у меня иное устремленье; Он лучше всех, прекрасный доктор мой. 
 Его любовь чудесней воскрешенья, Богатств богаче знатных королей, И псы его достойны восхищенья; Безумно горд любовью я моей: 
 Но огорчаюсь тем негодный я, Что всем один горжусь, любовь моя. 
 
 
 
 
 92.
 But do thy worst to steal thyself away, For term of life thou art assured mine, And life no longer than thy love will stay, For it depends upon that love of thine. 
 Then need I not to fear the worst of wrongs, When in the least of them my life hath end. I see a better state to me belongs Than that which on thy humour doth depend; 
 Thou canst not vex me with inconstant mind, Since that my life on thy revolt doth lie. O, what a happy title do I find, Happy to have thy love, happy to die! 
 But what's so blessed-fair that fears no blot? Thou mayst be false, and yet I know it not. 
 
 
 92.
 Но хуже то, что ускользаешь ты, Моё лицо имея в этой жизни, А жизнь не дольше дерзостной мечты Понять твой образ, милый и капризный. 
 Ненужный страх другого опасаться, Путь завершая, не поняв тебя. Раз ты во мне, то нужно постараться Тебя узнать, и полюбить себя; 
 Неверной мыслью ты дразнить не можешь, Ведь жизнь тогда моя поднимет бунт. О, счастья миг, ты мои силы множишь, Люблю любовь мою и смертный грунт! 
 Но почему же страх не пропадает? Вдруг ты обман, и что тогда - не знает. 
 
 
 
 
 93.
 So shall I live, supposing thou art true, Like a deceived husband; so love's face May still seem love to me, though alter'd new; Thy looks with me, thy heart in other place: 
 For there can live no hatred in thine eye, Therefore in that I cannot know thy change. In many's looks the false heart's history Is writ in moods and frowns and wrinkles strange, 
 But heaven in thy creation did decree That in thy face sweet love should ever dwell; Whate'er thy thoughts or thy heart's workings be, Thy looks should nothing thence but sweetness tell. 
 How like Eve's apple doth thy beauty grow, if thy sweet virtue answer not thy show! 
 
 
 93.
 Я буду жить, допустим, ты не врёшь, Как счастлив муж, своих рогов не зная; Вот, улыбаясь, ты вонзаешь нож; Со мной улыбкой, сердцем изменяя: 
 Итак, во взгляде ненависти нет, Я в нём живу, не ведая подвоха. Как странно: исторический сюжет Наполнен ужасом кровавых вздохов, 
 А ты с лучистой искрою в глазах, Которую зажгло святое небо; Не исказит их свет ни боль, ни страх, Червь ярости не вспыхнет в них свирепо. 
 Совсем как в яблоке в саду далёком, Чья красота манит запретным соком! 
 
 
 
 
 94.
 They that have power to hurt and will do none, That do not do the thing they most do show, Who, moving others, are themselves as stone, Unmoved, cold, and to temptation slow, 
 They rightly do inherit heaven's graces And husband nature's riches from expense; They are the lords and owners of their faces, Others but stewards of their excellence. 
 The summer's flower is to the summer sweet, Though to itself it only live and die, But if that flower with base infection meet, The basest weed outbraves his dignity: 
 For sweetest things turn sourest by their deeds; Lilies that fester smell far worse than weeds. 
 
 
 94.
 Кто укротил соблазны разрушенья, Владея силой тысячи слонов, Кто избежит войны опустошенья, И обуздать агрессию готов, 
 Воистину небесное наследство Тот заслужил спокойствием своим; И ценит мир его добрососедство, И превосходство признаёт за ним. 
 Прекрасны летней лилии цветы, Хоть для себя живут и умирают, Но если встретят сорные жгуты, Которые их подло презирают, 
 То изменяется их кроткий нрав; Гниенья запах хуже сорных трав. 
 
 
 
 
 95.
 How sweet and lovely dost thou make the shame Which, like a canker in the fragrant rose, Doth spot the beauty of thy budding name! O, in what sweets dost thou thy sins enclose! 
 That tongue that tells the story of thy days, Making lascivious comments on thy sport, Cannot dispraise but in a kind of praise; Naming thy name blesses an ill report. 
 O, what a mansion have those vices got Which for their habitation chose out thee, Where beauty's veil doth cover every blot, And all things turn to fair that eyes can see! 
 Take heed, dear heart, of this large privilege; The hardest knife ill-used doth lose his edge. 
 
 
 95.
 Как свежий дар твой в стыд оборотился, Словно жучок, цветочный старожил, Бутон пятнает, тот, что распустился! О, ты красиво грех огородил! 
 Биограф твой, рассказывая внукам, Пикантные истории забав, Успешен будет, распуская слухи; Среди больных портрет твой указав. 
 В твоих хоромах злобные пороки Всё затянули тиной метастаз, Вуалью скрыли прелести истоки, И красоты не видит чистый глаз! 
 О, сердце, береги свою мечту; В пыли клинок теряет остроту. 
 
 
 
 
 96.
 Some say thy fault is youth, some wantonness; Some say thy grace is youth and gentle sport; Both grace and faults are loved of more and less; Thou makest faults graces that to thee resort. 
 As on the finger of a throned queen The basest jewel will be well esteem'd, So are those errors that in thee are seen To truths translated and for true things deem'd. 
 How many lambs might the stern wolf betray, If like a lamb he could his looks translate! How many gazers mightst thou lead away, If thou wouldst use the strength of all thy state! 
 But do not so; I love thee in such sort As, thou being mine, mine is thy good report. 
 
 
 96.
 Ошибка, скажут, юность, иль разврат; Другие скажут, лучшие мгновенья; Но обе точки зрения грешат; Подъёма не бывает без паденья. 
 Как на руке сиятельного принца Мы почитаем низменный брильянт, Так и твои чудовища зверинца, Ведя на свет, тебя обогатят. 
 Как много жертв голодный волк утащит, Прикинувшись ягнёнком, диверсант! Как может многих слабых одурачить Твой странный и недюжинный талант! 
 Не делай так; люблю тебя, ведь ты - Очарование моей мечты. 
 
 
 
 
 97.
 How like a winter hath my absence been From thee, the pleasure of the fleeting year! What freezings have I felt, what dark days seen! What old December's bareness every where! 
 And yet this time removed was summer's time, The teeming autumn, big with rich increase, Bearing the wanton burden of the prime, Like widow'd wombs after their lords' decease: 
 Yet this abundant issue seem'd to me But hope of orphans and unfather'd fruit; For summer and his pleasures wait on thee, And, thou away, the very birds are mute; 
 Or, if they sing, 'tis with so dull a cheer That leaves look pale, dreading the winter's near. 
 
 
 97.
 С тобой разлука как мороз зимой, Как мимолётный росчерк ревизора! Полярной ночи холод ледяной! И нищета декабрьского простора! 
 Однако же, не только холод свой С собой несёт предательская стужа, Но и рожденье жизни молодой, Как плод несчастной, схоронившей мужа: 
 Не только изобилье для меня ты, Но сироте надежда на приют; Дни летние твоим теплом объяты, А ты уйдёшь, и птицы не поют; 
 А запоют, так скучные псалмы, Как лист, побитый холодом зимы. 
 
 
 
 
 98.
 From you have I been absent in the spring, When proud-pied April dress'd in all his trim Hath put a spirit of youth in every thing, That heavy Saturn laugh'd and leap'd with him. 
 Yet nor the lays of birds nor the sweet smell Of different flowers in odour and in hue Could make me any summer's story tell, Or from their proud lap pluck them where they grew; 
 Nor did I wonder at the lily's white, Nor praise the deep vermilion in the rose; They were but sweet, but figures of delight, Drawn after you, you pattern of all those. 
 Yet seem'd it winter still, and, you away, As with your shadow I with these did play: 
 
 
 98.
 С тобой, мой принц, расстался я весной, Когда Апрель надменный украшался, Одеждою любуясь молодой, И в путь Сатурн весёлый устремлялся. 
 Ни птичий гам, ни запахи лесные Ещё свой аромат не обрели, Не рассказали сны свои цветные, Не указали место, где взросли; 
 Не изумлялся лилий белизне я, И розы алый цвет я не хвалил, Пьянили краски их чуть-чуть позднее, Природный скульптор их с тебя лепил. 
 Ещё зима, казалось, нет тебя, И тенью я твоей играл, любя: 
 
 
 
 
 99.
 The forward violet thus did I chide: 
 Sweet thief, whence didst thou steal thy sweet that smells, If not from my love's breath? The purple pride Which on thy soft cheek for complexion dwells In my love's veins thou hast too grossly dyed. 
 The lily I condemned for thy hand, And buds of marjoram had stol'n thy hair: The roses fearfully on thorns did stand, One blushing shame, another white despair; 
 A third, nor red nor white, had stol'n of both And to his robbery had annex'd thy breath; But, for his theft, in pride of all his growth A vengeful canker eat him up to death. 
 More flowers I noted, yet I none could see But sweet or colour it had stol'n from thee. 
 
 
 99.
 Сначала я фиалку упрекал: 
 "Скажи, воришка, из его груди ли Украл ты запах? Царственный нахал, Тебя его следы изобличили, Ибо ты кровью щёки запятнал". 
 Я в лилии cлед рук твоих заметил, А майоран украл копну волос: Ещё с шипами розы я приметил, В печали белой, в алой краске слёз; 
 Другие розы, без стыда и горя, Твой вздох украли, лёгкий и живой; Но, с наглыми грабителями споря, Жучок их ест, отважный мститель твой. 
 Много цветов ещё не видел я, Но все воруют свежесть у тебя. 
 
 
 
 
 100.
 Where art thou, Muse, that thou forget'st so long To speak of that which gives thee all thy might? Spend'st thou thy fury on some worthless song, Darkening thy power to lend base subjects light? 
 Return, forgetful Muse, and straight redeem In gentle numbers time so idly spent; Sing to the ear that doth thy lays esteem And gives thy pen both skill and argument. 
 Rise, resty Muse, my love's sweet face survey, If Time have any wrinkle graven there; If any, be a satire to decay, And make Time's spoils despised every where. 
 Give my love fame faster than Time wastes life; So thou prevent'st his scythe and crooked knife. 
 
 
 100.
 Твой чистый голос, Муза, был прекрасен, О, почему теперь он не поёт? Растрачен пыл на сонмы низких басен? Теперь ты с ними водишь хоровод? 
 Вернись, забытая, и искупленьем Потраченное время возврати; Наполни душу мне чудесным пеньем, Исторгни тяжесть из моей груди. 
 Запомни свежий цвет моей любви; И, если Время высечет морщины, Над ним посмейся, юность оживи, И преврати его добро в руины. 
 Прославь любовь мою наперекор годам; Косою острою пусть не чинит вреда. 
 
 
 
 
 101.
 O truant Muse, what shall be thy amends For thy neglect of truth in beauty dyed? Both truth and beauty on my love depends; So dost thou too, and therein dignified. 
 Make answer, Muse: wilt thou not haply say 'Truth needs no colour, with his colour fix'd; Beauty no pencil, beauty's truth to lay; But best is best, if never intermix'd?' 
 Because he needs no praise, wilt thou be dumb? Excuse not silence so; for't lies in thee To make him much outlive a gilded tomb, And to be praised of ages yet to be. 
 Then do thy office, Muse; I teach thee how To make him seem long hence as he shows now. 
 
 
 101.
 Как можно, Муза праздная, исправить Небрежность правды на холсте любви? Быть может, красоты чуть-чуть добавить? Она, быть может, краски оживит? 
 Ответствуй, Муза: ты ли говорила: "Не нужно правду цветом искажать; А красота и так всегда правдива; Но всё же лучше их перемешать?" 
 Молчать ты будешь, раз похвал не ждёшь? Но ложь не извинит твоё молчанье; Разве бессмертье в склепе обретёшь, Средь золота в нескромном одеянье. 
 Вот твоё место, Муза; без прикрас, Бессмертно то, что истинно сейчас. 
 
 
 
 
 102.
 My love is strengthen'd, though more weak in seeming; I love not less, though less the show appear: That love is merchandized whose rich esteeming The owner's tongue doth publish every where. 
 Our love was new and then but in the spring When I was wont to greet it with my lays, As Philomel in summer's front doth sing And stops her pipe in growth of riper days: 
 Not that the summer is less pleasant now Than when her mournful hymns did hush the night, But that wild music burthens every bough And sweets grown common lose their dear delight. 
 Therefore like her I sometime hold my tongue, Because I would not dull you with my song. 
 
 
 102.
 Хоть с виду слабая, любовь сильна; Тем больше свет её, чем меньше видно: Ведь та любовь, которая видна, Увлечена торговлею постыдной. 
 Наша любовь была в объятьях мая, И гимны пел тебе я, мой герой, Как Соловей поёт, июнь встречая, Но замолкает знойною порой. 
 Не меньше любит траурный певец Ночных мелодий стройное звучанье, Но звук его причудливых колец Средь звуков новых тонет без вниманья. 
 И потому, молчи, язык мой смелый, Я не хочу, чтоб пенье надоело. 
 
 
 
 
 103.
 Alack, what poverty my Muse brings forth, That having such a scope to show her pride, The argument all bare is of more worth Than when it hath my added praise beside! 
 O, blame me not, if I no more can write! Look in your glass, and there appears a face That over-goes my blunt invention quite, Dulling my lines and doing me disgrace. 
 Were it not sinful then, striving to mend, To mar the subject that before was well? For to no other pass my verses tend Than of your graces and your gifts to tell; 
 And more, much more, than in my verse can sit Your own glass shows you when you look in it. 
 
 
 103.
 Увы, границы гордости своей, Воздвигла Муза бедная моя, Словам похвальным пустоты моей Границы эти противостоят! 
 Не осуди, с трудом слова пишу! Мой мозг туманит твой двойник зеркальный, О снисхождении его прошу, Но он позорит мой сонет печальный. 
 Разве не грех, пытаясь преуспеть, Разрушить прежних песен основанье? Иного не хочу я, лишь воспеть Твой дар и свет его очарованья; 
 Но, верно, лучше слова моего Расскажет зеркало, вглядись в него. 
 
 
 
 
 104.
 To me, fair friend, you never can be old, For as you were when first your eye I eyed, Such seems your beauty still. Three winters cold Have from the forests shook three summers' pride, 
 Three beauteous springs to yellow autumn turn'd In process of the seasons have I seen, Three April perfumes in three hot Junes burn'd, Since first I saw you fresh, which yet are green. 
 Ah! yet doth beauty, like a dial-hand, Steal from his figure and no pace perceived; So your sweet hue, which methinks still doth stand, Hath motion and mine eye may be deceived: 
 For fear of which, hear this, thou age unbred; Ere you were born was beauty's summer dead. 
 
 
 104.
 Ты для меня не будешь старым, друг, С тех пор, как повстречались мы, едва ли Ты изменился. Стужи зимних вьюг Три раза гордость летнюю сковали, 
 И три весны созрели урожаем, И трижды сжёг июнь апрельский след, Но твой апрель остался, не сжигаем, И свеж по-прежнему твой юный цвет. 
 Ах! может красота подобно стрелке, Что у часов крадёт незримый ход; Иль измененья шаг настолько мелкий, Что глаз не видит, но оно идёт: 
 А может, чтоб краса не изменялась, Пред тем как ты родился, принц, скончалась. 
 
 
 
 
 105.
 Let not my love be call'd idolatry, Nor my beloved as an idol show, Since all alike my songs and praises be To one, of one, still such, and ever so. 
 Kind is my love to-day, to-morrow kind, Still constant in a wondrous excellence; Therefore my verse to constancy confined, One thing expressing, leaves out difference. 
 'Fair, kind and true' is all my argument, 'Fair, kind, and true' varying to other words; And in this change is my invention spent, Three themes in one, which wondrous scope affords. 
 'Fair, kind, and true,' have often lived alone, Which three till now never kept seat in one. 
 
 
 105.
 Не упрекай в язычестве меня, Моя любовь не идолу служенье, Хотя стихи мои игрой огня Напомнят игры прежних посвящений. 
 В час поздний, вечером иль утром ясным Одна любовь моя в сиянье дней; Един мой стих в различии прекрасном, В пределах верных верности моей. 
 Вот доводы, "добро и красота, И истина", и больше слов не нужно; Три довода, в которых чистота В одном переплетении воздушном. 
 "Добро, и истина, и красота", Веди нас, путеводная звезда. 
 
 
 
 
 106.
 When in the chronicle of wasted time I see descriptions of the fairest wights, And beauty making beautiful old rhyme In praise of ladies dead and lovely knights, 
 Then, in the blazon of sweet beauty's best, Of hand, of foot, of lip, of eye, of brow, I see their antique pen would have express'd Even such a beauty as you master now. 
 So all their praises are but prophecies Of this our time, all you prefiguring; And, for they look'd but with divining eyes, They had not skill enough your worth to sing: 
 For we, which now behold these present days, Had eyes to wonder, but lack tongues to praise. 
 
 
 106.
 Когда я в хрониках прошедших лет Портрет встречаю доблестного мужа, И даме адресованный сонет, Мне рифмы старые терзают душу, 
 Я вновь и вновь читаю восхваленье Умерших глаз, и красоту бровей, И столько страсти в дивном песнопенье, Как в лучших рифмах наших славных дней. 
 Как светлое пророчество для нас Прообраз тайный, пасмурный, далёкий; Прекрасный свет твоих чудесных глаз Угадан мастером чужой эпохи: 
 Наш современник может в них смотреть, Но нет поэта, кто б их смог воспеть. 
 
 
 
 
 107.
 Not mine own fears, nor the prophetic soul Of the wide world dreaming on things to come, Can yet the lease of my true love control, Supposed as forfeit to a confined doom. 
 The mortal moon hath her eclipse endured And the sad augurs mock their own presage; Incertainties now crown themselves assured And peace proclaims olives of endless age. 
 Now with the drops of this most balmy time My love looks fresh, and death to me subscribes, Since, spite of him, I'll live in this poor rhyme, While he insults o'er dull and speechless tribes: 
 And thou in this shalt find thy monument, When tyrants' crests and tombs of brass are spent. 
 
 
 107.
 Ни страх мой и ни солнечный пророк Не смогут взять любовь мою под стражу, Я думаю, что сила этих строк Спасёт от злой беды надежду нашу. 
 Затмения печаль снесла луна, Оракулы смеются над собою; И мир венчает сердце вещуна, И ветвь оливы над седой главою. 
 Моей любви ещё свежо чело, И спорю я со смертною стихией, Что в рифме буду жить я, ей назло, Пока покорны племена немые: 
 И твою память строки сохранят, Когда устанет от тиранов ад. 
 
 
 
 
 108.
 What's in the brain that ink may character Which hath not figured to thee my true spirit? What's new to speak, what new to register, That may express my love or thy dear merit? 
 Nothing, sweet boy; but yet, like prayers divine, I must, each day say o'er the very same, Counting no old thing old, thou mine, I thine, Even as when first I hallow'd thy fair name. 
 So that eternal love in love's fresh case Weighs not the dust and injury of age, Nor gives to necessary wrinkles place, But makes antiquity for aye his page, 
 Finding the first conceit of love there bred Where time and outward form would show it dead. 
 
 
 108.
 Есть что-нибудь, о чём бы ни сказал я? Есть светлый дух, что не в тебе, мой друг? Есть новизна, покрытая вуалью, Невыраженный знак твоих заслуг? 
 Нет ничего; но, словно божье слово, Без устали я должен повторять, "Ты мой, я твой", хоть это и не ново, Но имя чту прекрасное опять. 
 В ларце чудесном вечная любовь, Ни времени, ни тлену недоступном, На древний зов любви откликнись, кровь, Прекрасным, сильным, чистым звуком трубным. 
 Ведь кто найдёт причудливый ларец, Жив и тогда, когда придёт конец. 
 
 
 
 
 109.
 O, never say that I was false of heart, Though absence seem'd my flame to qualify. As easy might I from myself depart As from my soul, which in thy breast doth lie: 
 That is my home of love: if I have ranged, Like him that travels I return again, Just to the time, not with the time exchanged, So that myself bring water for my stain. 
 Never believe, though in my nature reign'd All frailties that besiege all kinds of blood, That it could so preposterously be stain'd, To leave for nothing all thy sum of good; 
 For nothing this wide universe I call, Save thou, my rose; in it thou art my all. 
 
 
 109.
 Не говори, что сердце изменило, Пускай, мой друг, тебя омолодит Не прах мой, что лежит в земле унылой, А дух мой, что живёт в твоей груди: 
 Там дом моей любви: после скитаний, К истокам прихожу, смиряя прыть, Не зная времени и расстояний, И воду приношу, чтоб пятна смыть. 
 Не верь, что рок всегда карает слепо, Мерцает пламя в царстве темноты, И можно всё испачкать так нелепо, Что не увидишь добрые черты; 
 Живая роза, только ты нетленна Останешься одна во всей вселенной. 
 
 
 
 
 110.
 Alas, 'tis true I have gone here and there And made myself a motley to the view, Gored mine own thoughts, sold cheap what is most dear, Made old offences of affections new; 
 Most true it is that I have look'd on truth Askance and strangely: but, by all above, These blenches gave my heart another youth, And worse essays proved thee my best of love. 
 Now all is done, have what shall have no end: Mine appetite I never more will grind On newer proof, to try an older friend, A god in love, to whom I am confined. 
 Then give me welcome, next my heaven the best, Even to thy pure and most most loving breast. 
 
 
 110.
 Увы, всё правда, шутовской наряд, Носил я гордо и с большой любовью, Пронзал пространство мой весёлый взгляд, Латал заплаты я своею кровью; 
 Всё правда, принимаю я укор, Стихи нелепы, в этом нет сомнений: Но, худших шуток заурядный сор Я ткал из самых лучших побуждений. 
 Всё в прошлом, хоть не скоро мой конец: Пойду вперёд без лишних экивоков, Мои друзья и любящий отец Поймут всю тяжесть моих тяжких вздохов. 
 Дай руку и в полёт, в полёт, в полёт, Ждёт чистота немеркнущих высот. 
 
 
 
 
 111.
 O, for my sake do you with Fortune chide, The guilty goddess of my harmful deeds, That did not better for my life provide Than public means which public manners breeds. 
 Thence comes it that my name receives a brand, And almost thence my nature is subdued To what it works in, like the dyer's hand: Pity me then and wish I were renew'd; 
 Whilst, like a willing patient, I will drink Potions of eisel 'gainst my strong infection No bitterness that I will bitter think, Nor double penance, to correct correction. 
 Pity me then, dear friend, and I assure ye Even that your pity is enough to cure me. 
 
 
 111.
 Ради меня Фортуну прокляни, Причину моих пагубных пристрастий, Из-за её несносной пятерни В глазах людей виновник я несчастий. 
 Пугают моим именем детей, А мне оно досталось от рожденья, Как метка чёрная судьбы моей: О, пощади, я жажду обновленья; 
 Примерный пациент, я пить готов Любых микстур немыслимые дозы, Пусть труден путь к спасенью и суров, Перетерпеть согласен боль и слёзы. 
 Для исцеленья, верю! моего Достаточно лишь слова твоего. 
 
 
 
 
 112.
 Your love and pity doth the impression fill Which vulgar scandal stamp'd upon my brow; For what care I who calls me well or ill, So you o'er-green my bad, my good allow? 
 You are my all the world, and I must strive To know my shames and praises from your tongue: None else to me, nor I to none alive, That my steel'd sense or changes right or wrong. 
 In so profound abysm I throw all care Of others' voices, that my adder's sense To critic and to flatterer stopped are. Mark how with my neglect I do dispense: 
 You are so strongly in my purpose bred That all the world besides methinks are dead. 
 
 
 112.
 Любовь и жалость, жалость и любовь Сотрут рубцы, избавят от мучений; Но для чего судьба кромсала бровь? И для чего свершилось исцеленье? 
 Ты знаешь тьму и свет, и тайны мира, Ты знаешь стыд и цену мне, скажи: Добра и правды укажи пунктиры, Зачем был болен я, зачем я жив. 
 В пучину пропасти я брошен был, Где чувства спят, и гады копошатся, Где звуки призраков, и тень могил. Скажи, как мне, упавшему, подняться: 
 Ты так боролся за больную душу, Что весь привычный мир мой ты разрушил. 
 
 
 
 
 113.
 Since I left you, mine eye is in my mind; And that which governs me to go about Doth part his function and is partly blind, Seems seeing, but effectually is out; 
 For it no form delivers to the heart Of bird of flower, or shape, which it doth latch: Of his quick objects hath the mind no part, Nor his own vision holds what it doth catch: 
 For if it see the rudest or gentlest sight, The most sweet favour or deformed'st creature, The mountain or the sea, the day or night, The crow or dove, it shapes them to your feature: 
 Incapable of more, replete with you, My most true mind thus makes mine eye untrue. 
 
 
 113.
 С тобой в разлуке, мысль замена зренью; Мысль - поводырь мой, что ведёт меня Своей слепой таинственною тенью, И будто свет прекрасный вижу я; 
 Не различает мысль размер и форму, Силки иль птица, роза или плен: Ни дух цветка, ни крыльев взмах проворный Не ведают своих суровых стен: 
 На грубый мир взгляну отважным взором, Везде следы твои, твои черты, День светлый, ночь ли, голубь или ворон, Моря иль горы, ты повсюду, ты: 
 Кроме тебя не вижу ничего я, Глаза обманные тому виною. 
 
 
 
 
 114.
 Or whether doth my mind, being crown'd with you, Drink up the monarch's plague, this flattery? Or whether shall I say, mine eye saith true, And that your love taught it this alchemy, 
 To make of monsters and things indigest Such cherubins as your sweet self resemble, Creating every bad a perfect best, As fast as objects to his beams assemble? 
 O,'tis the first; 'tis flattery in my seeing, And my great mind most kingly drinks it up: Mine eye well knows what with his gust is 'greeing, And to his palate doth prepare the cup: 
 If it be poison'd, 'tis the lesser sin That mine eye loves it and doth first begin. 
 
 
 114.
 Моя ли мысль мне льстит, твоё наследство, Монарший кубок поднося с чумой? Иль глаз моих врождённое эстетство Воспринимает мир совсем иной, 
 Рождая чудищ, грозных великанов, Чтоб позже наделить их красотой, С тобой сравнить уродов этих странных, И забавляться странною игрой? 
 Нет, первое; принять питьё решаясь, Мне льстят глаза и совращают мозг: Глаза отлично знают, соглашаясь, Обманного вина фальшивый лоск: 
 Если отрава, твой грех невелик, Сначала яд в глаза мои проник. 
 
 
 
 
 115.
 Those lines that I before have writ do lie, Even those that said I could not love you dearer: Yet then my judgment knew no reason why My most full flame should afterwards burn clearer. 
 But reckoning time, whose million'd accidents Creep in 'twixt vows and change decrees of kings, Tan sacred beauty, blunt the sharp'st intents, Divert strong minds to the course of altering things; 
 Alas, why, fearing of time's tyranny, Might I not then say 'Now I love you best,' When I was certain o'er incertainty, Crowning the present, doubting of the rest? 
 Love is a babe; then might I not say so, To give full growth to that which still doth grow? 
 
 
 115.
 Я говорил "люблю" и так привык, Что стало ложью слово попугая, Не знал тогда я, пламени язык Меня коснётся, сердце обжигая. 
 Но времени загар красой священной Взгляд ослепил, от цели уводя, А миллион несчастий и измены Испытывали клятвы короля. 
 Зачем, увы, со временем в раздоре В дне завтрашнем не был уверен я, И не сказал с отвагою во взоре: "Мечта моя, теперь люблю тебя"? 
 Любовь - малыш; он всё ещё растёт, Как оценить не прерванный полёт. 
 
 
 
 
 116.
 Let me not to the marriage of true minds Admit impediments. Love is not love Which alters when it alteration finds, Or bends with the remover to remove: 
 O no! it is an ever-fixed mark That looks on tempests and is never shaken; It is the star to every wandering bark, Whose worth's unknown, although his height be taken. 
 Love's not Time's fool, though rosy lips and cheeks Within his bending sickle's compass come: Love alters not with his brief hours and weeks, But bears it out even to the edge of doom. 
 If this be error and upon me proved, I never writ, nor no man ever loved. 
 
 
 116.
 Не допусти помех к сближенью истин. Любовь, что гнётся, это не любовь, Отравленный родник не станет чистым, Грех, разрушая душу, губит кровь: 
 Нет, нет! любовь - огонь, святой треножник, Ориентир незыблемый, живой; Звезда, чей свет взыскательный художник Зрит в вышине и правит парус свой. 
 Любовь - не шут, не временщик обманный, Вострящий серп лукавою рукой: Любовь поддержкой помощи нежданной От гибели спасёт и смерти злой. 
 А если нет, и лгут слова мои, Умри, мой стих, раз нет в тебе любви. 
 
 
 
 
 117.
 Accuse me thus: that I have scanted all Wherein I should your great deserts repay, Forgot upon your dearest love to call, Whereto all bonds do tie me day by day; 
 That I have frequent been with unknown minds And given to time your own dear-purchased right That I have hoisted sail to all the winds Which should transport me farthest from your sight. 
 Book both my wilfulness and errors down And on just proof surmise accumulate; Bring me within the level of your frown, But shoot not at me in your waken'd hate; 
 Since my appeal says I did strive to prove The constancy and virtue of your love. 
 
 
 117.
 Вини меня: в бесплодном размышленье Я проводил, скупец, за днями дни, Моей любви окованный забвеньем, Не мог я выбраться из западни; 
 Терзался часто я тяжелым чувством, Что парус я послушный подниму, А мой корабль со скрежетом и хрустом Умчат ветра в неведомую тьму. 
 Мой грех найди и ложные тревоги, Пойми их смысл и опыт дорогой; Испепели меня, учитель строгий, Но не казни безжалостной рукой; 
 К тебе взываю, твёрдость прояви, И силу добродетельной любви. 
 
 
 
 
 118.
 Like as, to make our appetites more keen, With eager compounds we our palate urge, As, to prevent our maladies unseen, We sicken to shun sickness when we purge, 
 Even so, being full of your ne'er-cloying sweetness, To bitter sauces did I frame my feeding And, sick of welfare, found a kind of meetness To be diseased ere that there was true needing. 
 Thus policy in love, to anticipate The ills that were not, grew to faults assured And brought to medicine a healthful state Which, rank of goodness, would by ill be cured: 
 But thence I learn, and find the lesson true, Drugs poison him that so fell sick of you. 
 
 
 118.
 Как перец острый множит аппетит, Наш вкус смешеньем пылким пробуждая, И как лекарство хворь предотвратит, От тяжести желудок очищая, 
 Так я под соусом твоим прекрасным Измыслил стол, богатый и большой, Но пресыщеньем яств разнообразных Теперь страдаю, пациент больной. 
 Любовь хитра, она предупреждает Возникшей тошнотой о силах зла, И тем больные силы исцеляет, Желая нам здоровья и добра: 
 Так я учусь, и нахожу урок, Как, принимая яд, лечить порок. 
 
 
 
 
 119.
 What potions have I drunk of Siren tears, Distill'd from limbecks foul as hell within, Applying fears to hopes and hopes to fears, Still losing when I saw myself to win! 
 What wretched errors hath my heart committed, Whilst it hath thought itself so blessed never! How have mine eyes out of their spheres been fitted In the distraction of this madding fever! 
 O benefit of ill! now I find true That better is by evil still made better; And ruin'd love, when it is built anew, Grows fairer than at first, more strong, far greater. 
 So I return rebuked to my content And gain by ill thrice more than I have spent. 
 
 
 119.
 Сирены слёзы пил я много раз, Как в перегонном кубе всё кипело, Надежды ужас, упованья газ Меня пугал, бурля в реторте смелой! 
 О, сколько сора, сердце, ты вместило, Пока лелеяло свои мечты! Безумца глаз, куда смотрел ты, милый! Заразу эту как не видел ты! 
 О, бенефис потерь! теперь-то знаю Злых помыслов прекрасный винегрет; И потому любовь я убиваю, Чтоб возродился её чистый свет. 
 Так я верну себе свои пороки И казнью награжу я их, жестокий. 
 
 
 
 
 120.
 That you were once unkind befriends me now, And for that sorrow which I then did feel Needs must I under my transgression bow, Unless my nerves were brass or hammer'd steel. 
 For if you were by my unkindness shaken As I by yours, you've pass'd a hell of time, And I, a tyrant, have no leisure taken To weigh how once I suffered in your crime. 
 O, that our night of woe might have remember'd My deepest sense, how hard true sorrow hits, And soon to you, as you to me, then tender'd The humble salve which wounded bosoms fits! 
 But that your trespass now becomes a fee; Mine ransoms yours, and yours must ransom me. 
 
 
 120.
 Мне помощь то, что ты был зол ко мне, Лекарством было огорченье это, Я был горбун с грехами на спине, Грехом лишь нервы были не задеты. 
 Сквозь время ты потряс мой горб недобрый И у горбатого отнял досуг, И ныне я, тиран уже безгорбый, Ценю поступок твой, мой добрый друг. 
 О, скорби ночь, напомнила ты мне, Как точный выпад губит супостата, И скоро я ударю в тишине И излечу твой горб, как ты когда-то. 
 Итак, я награжу тебя богато, Платил ты мне, и вот грядёт расплата. 
 
 
 
 
 121.
 'Tis better to be vile than vile esteem'd, When not to be receives reproach of being, And the just pleasure lost which is so deem'd Not by our feeling but by others' seeing: 
 For why should others false adulterate eyes Give salutation to my sportive blood? Or on my frailties why are frailer spies, Which in their wills count bad what I think good? 
 No, I am that I am, and they that level At my abuses reckon up their own: I may be straight, though they themselves be bevel; By their rank thoughts my deeds must not be shown; 
 Unless this general evil they maintain, All men are bad, and in their badness reign. 
 
 
 121.
 Быть подлым лучше, чем любить порок, Тогда не упрекнут тебя позором, Совсем не важно, что ты к чувствам строг, Важней как мир оценит строгим взором: 
 Зачем бы миру лгать и потакать Моим страстям, изменам и лукавству? На подлости кто сможет указать, Если везде царит одно коварство? 
 Нет, я есть я, и мир бранит меня Против своей природы несомненно: Я прав, мои неправые друзья; Я чист в делах пред чистою вселенной; 
 Зло возвышая, вот вам всем урок, Плохие все, раз царствует порок. 
 
 
 
 
 122.
 Thy gift, thy tables, are within my brain Full character'd with lasting memory, Which shall above that idle rank remain Beyond all date, even to eternity; 
 Or at the least, so long as brain and heart Have faculty by nature to subsist; Till each to razed oblivion yield his part Of thee, thy record never can be miss'd. 
 That poor retention could not so much hold, Nor need I tallies thy dear love to score; Therefore to give them from me was I bold, To trust those tables that receive thee more: 
 To keep an adjunct to remember thee Were to import forgetfulness in me. 
 
 
 122.
 В моём мозгу твой стол, твой дар бесценный, Я все слова запомнил, милый друг, Со мною будет слог твой вдохновенный, Даже когда исчезнет всё вокруг; 
 Пока мой мозг и сердце существуют, Они хранят твой пламенный урок; А после, принимая дань земную, Себе их прах возьмёт земной чертог; 
 В земной темнице грусти и забвенья Нет ничего, ни правды, ни любви; И потому без прежнего сомненья К словам моим вниманье прояви: 
 Ради тебя, себя готов забыть я, Знай, что царевна-память спит в укрытье. 
 
 
 
 
 123.
 No, Time, thou shalt not boast that I do change: Thy pyramids built up with newer might To me are nothing novel, nothing strange; They are but dressings of a former sight. 
 Our dates are brief, and therefore we admire What thou dost foist upon us that is old, And rather make them born to our desire Than think that we before have heard them told. 
 Thy registers and thee I both defy, Not wondering at the present nor the past, For thy records and what we see doth lie, Made more or less by thy continual haste. 
 This I do vow and this shall ever be; I will be true, despite thy scythe and thee. 
 
 
 123.
 Не нов, о Время, гордый твой наряд: Возводишь ты дворцы и пирамиды, Но камни их меня не удивят; Не удивят их вычурные виды. 
 Дни наши коротки, и потому Нас восхищают древние святыни, Навязанные нашему уму, Свидетели слепой твоей гордыни. 
 Их и тебя я вызываю, Время, Я вызываю на открытый бой Твоих дворцов причудливое племя, Воздвигнутых поспешною рукой. 
 Клянусь я в том, что вечны эти строки; Прав буду я, а не твой серп, жестокий. 
 
 
 
 
 124.
 If my dear love were but the child of state, It might for Fortune's bastard be unfather'd' As subject to Time's love or to Time's hate, Weeds among weeds, or flowers with flowers gather'd. 
 No, it was builded far from accident; It suffers not in smiling pomp, nor falls Under the blow of thralled discontent, Whereto the inviting time our fashion calls: 
 It fears not policy, that heretic, Which works on leases of short-number'd hours, But all alone stands hugely politic, That it nor grows with heat nor drowns with showers. 
 To this I witness call the fools of time, Which die for goodness, who have lived for crime. 
 
 
 124.
 Если любовь моя есть сирота, Силы судьбы зачем его чернили, Любим ли он иль дальше пустота, Сорняк ли он или цветок средь гнили. 
 Нет, не случайно он рождён судьбой; Он не страдает от усмешек знати, Ни от ударов страсти роковой И изменений времени некстати: 
 Догматов властных не боится он, Часы крадущих хитрою уловкой, Пусть даже мир весь хитростью пленён, Опутав всё погибельной верёвкой. 
 Шут и глупец у времени в петле, Тот умер для добра, кто жил во зле. 
 
 
 
 
 125.
 Were 't aught to me I bore the canopy, With my extern the outward honouring, Or laid great bases for eternity, Which prove more short than waste or ruining? 
 Have I not seen dwellers on form and favour Lose all, and more, by paying too much rent, For compound sweet forgoing simple savour, Pitiful thrivers, in their gazing spent? 
 No, let me be obsequious in thy heart, And take thou my oblation, poor but free, Which is not mix'd with seconds, knows no art, But mutual render, only me for thee. 
 Hence, thou suborn'd informer! a true soul When most impeach'd stands least in thy control. 
 
 
 125.
 Есть что-нибудь под добрым небосводом, Что мы оставим, обращаясь в прах, И долго ль будет вечная природа Нас вспоминать, и ужас наш, и страх? 
 Разве запомнил мир своих любимцев, Кто, увлекаясь собственной игрой, Расталкивал таких же проходимцев, Силы растратив в прихоти слепой? 
 Позволь, любовь, мне сердцем стать свободным, И ритмом лёгким бить в твоей груди, Сор изгони, художник благородный, И силы добрые к себе впусти. 
 Прочь, искус! и, очистившись душой, Ты станешь управлять своей судьбой. 
 
 
 
 
 126.
 O thou, my lovely boy, who in thy power Dost hold Time's fickle glass, his sickle, hour; 
 Who hast by waning grown, and therein show'st Thy lovers withering as thy sweet self grow'st; 
 If Nature, sovereign mistress over wrack, As thou goest onwards, still will pluck thee back, 
 She keeps thee to this purpose, that her skill May time disgrace and wretched minutes kill. 
 Yet fear her, O thou minion of her pleasure! She may detain, but not still keep, her treasure: 
 Her audit, though delay'd, answer'd must be, And her quietus is to render thee. 
 
 
 126.
 Серп Времени ты знаешь, мальчик мой, И зеркало Времён перед тобой; 
 Из малого, ничтожного зерна Ты вырос, и любовь твоя сильна; 
 Если Природа царственной рукою Твой дом разрушит и лишит покоя, 
 Она вознаградит тебя за труд Убийством праздных и тупых минут. 
 Её страшишься ты, её любимчик! Но есть у ней, кроме ножа, гостинчик: 
 В отсрочке платежа её ответ, Разгадка тайн и молодцу совет. 
 
 
 
 
 127.
 In the old age black was not counted fair, Or if it were, it bore not beauty's name; But now is black beauty's successive heir, And beauty slander'd with a bastard shame: 
 For since each hand hath put on nature's power, Fairing the foul with art's false borrow'd face, Sweet beauty hath no name, no holy bower, But is profaned, if not lives in disgrace. 
 Therefore my mistress' brows are raven black, Her eyes so suited, and they mourners seem At such who, not born fair, no beauty lack, Slandering creation with a false esteem: 
 Yet so they mourn, becoming of their woe, That every tongue says beauty should look so. 
 
 
 127.
 Уродливой считалась чернота, Никто не называл её красивой; Но ныне изменилась красота, Плебей оклеветал её спесивый: 
 С тех пор, как рвёт безжалостной рукою Прекрасные природные цветы, Стал храм природный нищей мастерскою, И тот профан, чьи помыслы чисты. 
 И потому природа чёрной тучей, Нахмурив брови, плачет всякий раз, Исход предвосхищая неминучий Клеветника, источника проказ: 
 И горько плачут чёрные потоки, Чтоб голос правды не был одинокий. 
 
 
 
 
 128.
 How oft, when thou, my music, music play'st, Upon that blessed wood whose motion sounds With thy sweet fingers, when thou gently sway'st The wiry concord that mine ear confounds, 
 Do I envy those jacks that nimble leap To kiss the tender inward of thy hand, Whilst my poor lips, which should that harvest reap, At the wood's boldness by thee blushing stand! 
 To be so tickled, they would change their state And situation with those dancing chips, O'er whom thy fingers walk with gentle gait, Making dead wood more blest than living lips. 
 Since saucy jacks so happy are in this, Give them thy fingers, me thy lips to kiss. 
 
 
 128.
 Как часто был я музыкой взволнован, Рождал восторг в груди твой стройный звук, Медвежье ухо упоеньем новым Внимало бегу драгоценных рук, 
 Завидовал я клавишам клавира, Что могут пальцы нежно целовать, А я, наполненный игрой кумира, Мог только губы бедные кусать! 
 Я забавлялся дивною картиной Весёлых и танцующих ребят, Волшебный танец с пальцем-балериной Неспешно вёл галантный их отряд. 
 Так счастливы они, и неспроста, Отдай им пальчики, а мне - уста. 
 
 
 
 
 129.
 The expense of spirit in a waste of shame Is lust in action; and till action, lust Is perjured, murderous, bloody, full of blame, Savage, extreme, rude, cruel, not to trust, 
 Enjoy'd no sooner but despised straight, Past reason hunted, and no sooner had Past reason hated, as a swallow'd bait On purpose laid to make the taker mad; 
 Mad in pursuit and in possession so; Had, having, and in quest to have, extreme; A bliss in proof, and proved, a very woe; Before, a joy proposed; behind, a dream. 
 All this the world well knows; yet none knows well To shun the heaven that leads men to this hell. 
 
 
 129.
 К стыду, к утрате духа страсть ведёт; Обмана страсть, убийства и злословья, Наживы страсть, сомнений тонкий лёд, Страсть грубости, потери хладнокровья, 
 Владея малой, но презренной честью, Мечту стремимся ухватить рукой, Но призрак отвечает чёрной местью, Отняв у вожделенного покой; 
 А страсть погони в нашем слабом взоре; След исправляет в воздухе пустом; Блаженство ищем, а находим горе; Мираж, сначала; тень его, потом. 
 Все это знают; но не знают лишь, Как свет небесный в ад зовёт и тишь. 
 
 
 
 
 130.
 My mistress' eyes are nothing like the sun; Coral is far more red than her lips' red; If snow be white, why then her breasts are dun; If hairs be wires, black wires grow on her head. 
 I have seen roses damask'd, red and white, But no such roses see I in her cheeks; And in some perfumes is there more delight Than in the breath that from my mistress reeks. 
 I love to hear her speak, yet well I know That music hath a far more pleasing sound; I grant I never saw a goddess go; My mistress, when she walks, treads on the ground: 
 And yet, by heaven, I think my love as rare As any she belied with false compare. 
 
 
 130.
 Свет глаз любимых солнцу проиграет; Коралл затмит собой цвет алых губ; Бледнее грудь, чем снег в альпийском крае; У колосистых злаков гибче чуб; 
 Дамасских роз чудесные бутоны Нежнее нежности её ланит; Благоуханный запах анемонов Скорей, чем вздох любимой опьянит. 
 Люблю я слушать пенье чаровницы, Но звуков лучших знаю волшебство; У нимф прелестней дивные ресницы; А у богинь изящнее чело: 
 И всё же, небеса, любовь моя Прекрасней всех, с кем сравниваю я. 
 
 
 
 
 131.
 Thou art as tyrannous, so as thou art, As those whose beauties proudly make them cruel; For well thou know'st to my dear doting heart Thou art the fairest and most precious jewel. 
 Yet, in good faith, some say that thee behold Thy face hath not the power to make love groan: To say they err I dare not be so bold, Although I swear it to myself alone. 
 And, to be sure that is not false I swear, A thousand groans, but thinking on thy face, One on another's neck, do witness bear Thy black is fairest in my judgment's place. 
 In nothing art thou black save in thy deeds, And thence this slander, as I think, proceeds. 
 
 
 131.
 Твой образ как лик деспота сердитый, Что мучит красотой жестоких глаз; Прекрасно знаешь, что в моей груди ты - Изысканный и солнечный алмаз. 
 Ценители искусства скажут мне, Во взоре силы нет, и мало света: Не смею возразить их болтовне, Не мне, друзья мои, судить об этом. 
 Но я клянусь, нет фальши в этом лике, Вглядитесь, тысячи, в черты лица, Найдётся, может быть, медведь безликий, Кто разгадает замысел творца. 
 Творенье очернить легко, быть может, Но чернота лишь клевету умножит. 
 
 
 
 
 132.
 Thine eyes I love, and they, as pitying me, Knowing thy heart torments me with disdain, Have put on black and loving mourners be, Looking with pretty ruth upon my pain. 
 And truly not the morning sun of heaven Better becomes the grey cheeks of the east, Nor that full star that ushers in the even Doth half that glory to the sober west, 
 As those two mourning eyes become thy face: O, let it then as well beseem thy heart To mourn for me, since mourning doth thee grace, And suit thy pity like in every part. 
 Then will I swear beauty herself is black And all they foul that thy complexion lack. 
 
 
 132.
 Люблю глаза твои, но, к сожаленью, И твоё сердце знает мою боль, Они в печали ищут наслажденье, Моих тиранов исполняя роль. 
 Не так ли солнце наглое с утра Свой бледный диск рисует на востоке, Не так ли полуночная пора Впивает в душу взор свой звездоокий, 
 Не так ли молнии прекрасных глаз: О, опечаль меня, как сердце просит, Сожги меня, пылающий алмаз, Пусть злобный ветер пепел мой уносит. 
 Так ты затмишь всех чёрной красотою, И успокоишь сердце золотое. 
 
 
 
 
 133.
 Beshrew that heart that makes my heart to groan For that deep wound it gives my friend and me! Is't not enough to torture me alone, But slave to slavery my sweet'st friend must be? 
 Me from myself thy cruel eye hath taken, And my next self thou harder hast engross'd: Of him, myself, and thee, I am forsaken; A torment thrice threefold thus to be cross'd. 
 Prison my heart in thy steel bosom's ward, But then my friend's heart let my poor heart bail; Whoe'er keeps me, let my heart be his guard; Thou canst not then use rigor in my gaol: 
 And yet thou wilt; for I, being pent in thee, Perforce am thine, and all that is in me. 
 
 
 133.
 Я проклинаю сердце в той груди, В которой я томлюсь в глухой темнице! И хорошо бы я страдал один, Зачем мой друг как раб немой томится? 
 И он, и я, напрасно мы взываем, А вместе с нами не рождённый брат: Забыл ты нас, себя не узнавая; Утроив втрое боль своих утрат. 
 Моя тюрьма в твоей груди жестокой, Но сердце друга помогает мне; А я - охранник друга светлоокий; И не замёрзнуть мне в твоей тюрьме: 
 Ещё я жив; но я невольник твой, И всё во мне - твоё, мучитель мой. 
 
 
 
 
 134.
 So, now I have confess'd that he is thine, And I myself am mortgaged to thy will, Myself I'll forfeit, so that other mine Thou wilt restore, to be my comfort still: 
 But thou wilt not, nor he will not be free, For thou art covetous and he is kind; He learn'd but surety-like to write for me Under that bond that him as fast doth bind. 
 The statute of thy beauty thou wilt take, Thou usurer, that put'st forth all to use, And sue a friend came debtor for my sake; So him I lose through my unkind abuse. 
 Him have I lost; thou hast both him and me: He pays the whole, and yet am I not free. 
 
 
 134.
 Теперь признаюсь, также твой мой друг, Тебе мы служим, в этом я ручаюсь, В ответе я за дело добрых рук, Продолжить дело друга постараюсь: 
 Не хочешь ты, а друг не может мой, Скупой и жадный ты, мой друг - надёжный; Но объяснил учитель дорогой, Как невозможное связать с возможным. 
 Поскольку ты блистаешь красотою И арендуешь славу молодца, А он преследует, прикрывшись мною; Позволь убить негодного истца. 
 Убью его я; ты потом двоих: В расчёте он, и я ничей должник. 
 
 
 
 
 135.
 Whoever hath her wish, thou hast thy 'Will,' And 'Will' to boot, and 'Will' in overplus; More than enough am I that vex thee still, To thy sweet will making addition thus. 
 Wilt thou, whose will is large and spacious, Not once vouchsafe to hide my will in thine? Shall will in others seem right gracious, And in my will no fair acceptance shine? 
 The sea all water, yet receives rain still And in abundance addeth to his store; So thou, being rich in 'Will,' add to thy 'Will' One will of mine, to make thy large 'Will' more. 
 Let no unkind, no fair beseechers kill; Think all but one, and me in that one 'Will.' 
 
 
 135.
 У курицы желанье, а в тебе - Есть "Воля", есть стремление и сила; Назло моей нескладной болтовне Ты горы сдвинешь и затмишь светила. 
 Ты хочешь стать большим и необъятным, Или погибнуть хочешь в тишине? Ты хочешь видеть мир с лицом опрятным, Иль хочешь, чтобы он сгорел в огне? 
 Умножь, гроза, избыток океанов, Смывая прочь истории грехов; Наполнись страшной Волей ураганов, По Воле солнца и моих стихов. 
 Оставь мольбы, страданья, слёзы, сплин; Исполнись Волею, мой исполин. 
 
 
 
 
 136.
 If thy soul check thee that I come so near, Swear to thy blind soul that I was thy 'Will,' And will, thy soul knows, is admitted there; Thus far for love my love-suit, sweet, fulfil. 
 'Will' will fulfil the treasure of thy love, Ay, fill it full with wills, and my will one. In things of great receipt with ease we prove Among a number one is reckon'd none: 
 Then in the number let me pass untold, Though in thy stores' account I one must be; For nothing hold me, so it please thee hold That nothing me, a something sweet to thee: 
 Make but my name thy love, and love that still, And then thou lovest me, for my name is 'Will.' 
 
 
 136.
 Коль душу своевольем я стеснил, Клянусь, твоя душа дала мне право, Я лишь потворствовал по мере сил; И исполнял любимые забавы. 
 Я сберегал сокровища любви, Я жил одним желаньем охраненья. Я не считал великий клад своим, И не считал несчётные каменья: 
 Сколь клад велик, позволь мне умолчать, Хотя желанье рассказать огромно; Но он весь твой, и даже малу пядь Я не могу присвоить вероломно: 
 Любовь есть ключ, хочу, чтоб клад открыл, Поскольку Воля - это имя Уилл. 
 
 
 
 
 137.
 Thou blind fool, Love, what dost thou to mine eyes, That they behold, and see not what they see? They know what beauty is, see where it lies, Yet what the best is take the worst to be. 
 If eyes corrupt by over-partial looks Be anchor'd in the bay where all men ride, Why of eyes' falsehood hast thou forged hooks, Whereto the judgment of my heart is tied? 
 Why should my heart think that a several plot Which my heart knows the wide world's common place? Or mine eyes seeing this, say this is not, To put fair truth upon so foul a face? 
 In things right true my heart and eyes have erred, And to this false plague are they now transferr'd. 
 
 
 137.
 Не ты ль, слепой дурак, своей любовью Глаза мне ослепил? и что теперь? Внимавшие красивому сословью, Глаза узнали торжество потерь. 
 Может ошибка тщетного пристрастья? Соломинки спасительной утюг? Мои друзья! собратья по несчастью! Вдруг это сердца вероломный трюк? 
 Как сможет сердце различить свой путь, Мимо которого весь мир проходит? Ужели очи, всюду видя муть, Найдут пути к сияющей свободе? 
 Вели они меня путём порока, И вывели на ложную дорогу. 
 
 
 
 
 138.
 When my love swears that she is made of truth I do believe her, though I know she lies, That she might think me some untutor'd youth, Unlearned in the world's false subtleties. 
 Thus vainly thinking that she thinks me young, Although she knows my days are past the best, Simply I credit her false speaking tongue: On both sides thus is simple truth suppress'd. 
 But wherefore says she not she is unjust? And wherefore say not I that I am old? O, love's best habit is in seeming trust, And age in love loves not to have years told: 
 Therefore I lie with her and she with me, And in our faults by lies we flatter'd be. 
 
 
 138.
 Когда любовь клянётся, я ей верю, Хотя подозреваю в ней обман, Я маску простодушия примерю, И лживый мир обманет наш роман. 
 Пусть мир считает, что наивна юность, Любовь прекрасно знает, что к чему, Я разрешил своей любви угрюмость: Она - нелепость слову моему. 
 Но почему она не скажет правды? А я о старых тайнах не скажу? Любит любовь нелепые преграды, И доверяет тайны лишь пажу: 
 Так другу лжём мы, древние шаманы, Нам льстят с любовью тайные туманы. 
 
 
 
 
 139.
 O, call not me to justify the wrong That thy unkindness lays upon my heart; Wound me not with thine eye but with thy tongue; Use power with power and slay me not by art. 
 Tell me thou lovest elsewhere, but in my sight, Dear heart, forbear to glance thine eye aside: What need'st thou wound with cunning when thy might Is more than my o'er-press'd defense can bide? 
 Let me excuse thee: ah! my love well knows Her pretty looks have been mine enemies, And therefore from my face she turns my foes, That they elsewhere might dart their injuries: 
 Yet do not so; but since I am near slain, Kill me outright with looks and rid my pain. 
 
 
 139.
 Не защищаю ложь я, но привык, Что раздаётся в сердце злобный лай; Не столько ранит взгляд твой, как язык; Используй силу, но не убивай. 
 Ты, сердце, любишь речь и мир вокруг, И мне дороже ты любых глаголов: Что сможет навредить тебе, мой друг, Когда сильнее ты моих уколов? 
 Тебя прощаю: часто без причины Любовь грозою искажает нас, Как у врага становится личина, И стрел обиды из любимых глаз: 
 Не делай так; любовь моя не враг, От мук меня избавит твой тесак. 
 
 
 
 
 140.
 Be wise as thou art cruel; do not press My tongue-tied patience with too much disdain; Lest sorrow lend me words and words express The manner of my pity-wanting pain. 
 If I might teach thee wit, better it were, Though not to love, yet, love, to tell me so; As testy sick men, when their deaths be near, No news but health from their physicians know; 
 For if I should despair, I should grow mad, And in my madness might speak ill of thee: Now this ill-wresting world is grown so bad, Mad slanderers by mad ears believed be, 
 That I may not be so, nor thou belied, Bear thine eyes straight, though thy proud heart go wide. 
 
 
 140.
 Будь мудрецом, как вид свирепый твой; Не презирай мою косноязычность; Отдай мне скорбность слов, мой дорогой, Меня пусть огорчает их токсичность. 
 Хотя любовь не ум, любовь поможет Учителю понять ученика; Но боль обид лишь нездоровье множит, Так свой конец предчувствует брюзга; 
 Отчаянье сопутствует безумству, Безумец не поймёт слова мои: Мир прагматизма, боли и кощунства Считает клеветой слова любви, 
 Глаза медведя не поверят им, Предвзятой гордости мешает грим. 
 
 
 
 
 141.
 In faith, I do not love thee with mine eyes, For they in thee a thousand errors note; But 'tis my heart that loves what they despise, Who in despite of view is pleased to dote; 
 Nor are mine ears with thy tongue's tune delighted, Nor tender feeling, to base touches prone, Nor taste, nor smell, desire to be invited To any sensual feast with thee alone: 
 But my five wits nor my five senses can Dissuade one foolish heart from serving thee, Who leaves unsway'd the likeness of a man, Thy proud hearts slave and vassal wretch to be: 
 Only my plague thus far I count my gain, That she that makes me sin awards me pain. 
 
 
 141.
 Мне говорят глаза, что облик твой Нельзя любить из-за изъянов грубых; Но сердце любит образ непростой, Назло глазам презренным сердце любит; 
 Не радует язык твой, помело, Отвратно прикоснуться к грязной коже, Плох вкус и запах твой, и тяжело Всем добрым чувствам, так ты невозможен: 
 Но сердце глупое, где ты живёшь, С пятёркой чувств и мыслей не согласно, Как прежде верит сердце в молодёжь, У подлости в плену, вассал несчастный: 
 Только чума, должно быть, мне поможет, И возвратит долг грешника, быть может. 
 
 
 
 
 142.
 Love is my sin and thy dear virtue hate, Hate of my sin, grounded on sinful loving: O, but with mine compare thou thine own state, And thou shalt find it merits not reproving; 
 Or, if it do, not from those lips of thine, That have profaned their scarlet ornaments And seal'd false bonds of love as oft as mine, Robb'd others' beds' revenues of their rents. 
 Be it lawful I love thee, as thou lovest those Whom thine eyes woo as mine importune thee: Root pity in thy heart, that when it grows Thy pity may deserve to pitied be. 
 If thou dost seek to have what thou dost hide, By self-example mayst thou be denied! 
 
 
 142.
 Мой грех - любовь, ты презираешь грешных И ненавидишь грех, попутчик лжи: Сравни меня с собой, и неизбежно Достоинства отыщешь у ханжи; 
 Иль, может, вспомнишь звуки юных уст, Какими оскорблял себя, бедняга, Поступков скверну, отрицанье уз, И разграбленье древних саркофагов. 
 Друг другу докучаем мы законно, Люблю глаза твои я, мой король, Боль сердца нужно слушать благосклонно, Идущий в рост услышит свою боль. 
 Если услышишь то, что нужно скрыть, Знак разглядишь, и восстановишь нить! 
 
 
 
 
 143.
 Lo! as a careful housewife runs to catch One of her feather'd creatures broke away, Sets down her babe and makes an swift dispatch In pursuit of the thing she would have stay, 
 Whilst her neglected child holds her in chase, Cries to catch her whose busy care is bent To follow that which flies before her face, Not prizing her poor infant's discontent; 
 So runn'st thou after that which flies from thee, Whilst I thy babe chase thee afar behind; But if thou catch thy hope, turn back to me, And play the mother's part, kiss me, be kind: 
 So will I pray that thou mayst have thy 'Will,' If thou turn back, and my loud crying still. 
 
 
 143.
 Эй! как хозяйка ловит бедных кур, На время забывая о сыночке, Чтоб не мешал ей юный бедокур, Его сажает где-то в уголочке, 
 Пока кричит от невниманья он, Она старается поймать хоть что-то, И чем спокойней милый купидон, Тем мать скорее завершит охоту; 
 Вот так вокруг тебя перо и пух, Я, будто сын, чей плач терзает душу; Но, отвернувшись, крик не режет слух, Будь матерью моей, меня послушай: 
 Скажи мне так, мой мальчик волевой, Ты отвернись, и крик не слушай мой. 
 
 
 
 
 144.
 Two loves I have of comfort and despair, Which like two spirits do suggest me still: The better angel is a man right fair, The worser spirit a woman colour'd ill. 
 To win me soon to hell, my female evil Tempteth my better angel from my side, And would corrupt my saint to be a devil, Wooing his purity with her foul pride. 
 And whether that my angel be turn'd fiend Suspect I may, but not directly tell; But being both from me, both to each friend, I guess one angel in another's hell: 
 Yet this shall I ne'er know, but live in doubt, Till my bad angel fire my good one out. 
 
 
 144.
 На радость, на беду есть две любви, На ухо шепчут мне два разных духа: Дух мужества с отвагою в крови, И дух болезни, хитрая старуха. 
 Ад победит, когда карга цветная Прельстит покоем духа красоты, И возгордится, святость попирая, Унылый дух бесплодной суеты. 
 Но если ангел не поддастся ей, Возможно, всё случится по иному; Зависит всё от мудрости моей, Пусть ангел здравый навредит больному: 
 Живут во мне сомнения, пока Мой ангел злой сжигает добряка. 
 
 
 
 
 145.
 Those lips that Love's own hand did make Breathed forth the sound that said 'I hate' To me that languish'd for her sake; But when she saw my woeful state, 
 Straight in her heart did mercy come, Chiding that tongue that ever sweet Was used in giving gentle doom, And taught it thus anew to greet: 
 'I hate' she alter'd with an end, That follow'd it as gentle day Doth follow night, who like a fiend From heaven to hell is flown away; 
 'I hate' from hate away she threw, And saved my life, saying 'not you.' 
 
 
 145.
 Томился я, и вдруг раскат Из уст любимых: "Ненавижу", И грома треск, и молний ад; Но, увидав, я скорбью движим, 
 Смягчилось сердце, и упрёк, Что бранью отозвалось эхо, Смутил язык, но вновь изрёк Нескладный звук свой неумеха: 
 "Я ненавижу", - как злодей Бьёт снопом искр земные скалы, Как ночь играет тенью дней, Пугая гибельным оскалом; 
 "Я ненавижу", - словно яд, Но жизнь вернулась, - "не тебя". 
 
 
 
 
 146.
 Poor soul, the centre of my sinful earth, [...] these rebel powers that thee array; Why dost thou pine within and suffer dearth, Painting thy outward walls so costly gay? 
 Why so large cost, having so short a lease, Dost thou upon thy fading mansion spend? Shall worms, inheritors of this excess, Eat up thy charge? is this thy body's end? 
 Then soul, live thou upon thy servant's loss, And let that pine to aggravate thy store; Buy terms divine in selling hours of dross; Within be fed, without be rich no more: 
 So shalt thou feed on Death, that feeds on men, And Death once dead, there's no more dying then. 
 
 
 146.
 Несчастная душа, центр плоти гнусной, [Вокруг] тебя войска твоих рабов; Зачем томишься ты в лачуге грустной И украшаешь крепости грехов? 
 Зачем ты тратишь силы жизни краткой, Дворец возводишь, золотой чертог? Чтоб черви и наследники достатка Его сожрали? это твой итог? 
 Душа-душа, служа червям кургузым, Скорбь умножаешь тела своего; Меняешь дар небес на низкий мусор; Земля поглотит прах, и нет его: 
 Когда ж готовишь пищу для ума, Съедают люди Смерть, мираж она. 
 
 
 
 
 147.
 My love is as a fever, longing still For that which longer nurseth the disease, Feeding on that which doth preserve the ill, The uncertain sickly appetite to please. 
 My reason, the physician to my love, Angry that his prescriptions are not kept, Hath left me, and I desperate now approve Desire is death, which physic did except. 
 Past cure I am, now reason is past care, And frantic-mad with evermore unrest; My thoughts and my discourse as madmen's are, At random from the truth vainly express'd; 
 For I have sworn thee fair and thought thee bright, Who art as black as hell, as dark as night. 
 
 
 147.
 Моя любовь подобна лихорадке, Что пестует болезнь и множит жар, А он готовит новые загадки, Чтоб бред их разрешил больной угар. 
 Не может разум-лекарь угадать, Какое средство утолит печали, И оставляет плоть мою страдать, Чтоб силы смерти мне лекарство дали. 
 В волненье устремлялся я назад, Искал безумным разумом истоки; Но разум бедный, возвращаясь в ад, Не мог извлечь полезные уроки; 
 Лишь клялся красотой и мыслью ясной, Печальной словно ночь, как ад ужасной. 
 
 
 
 
 148.
 O me, what eyes hath Love put in my head, Which have no correspondence with true sight! Or, if they have, where is my judgment fled, That censures falsely what they see aright? 
 If that be fair whereon my false eyes dote, What means the world to say it is not so? If it be not, then love doth well denote Love's eye is not so true as all men's 'No.' 
 How can it? O, how can Love's eye be true, That is so vex'd with watching and with tears? No marvel then, though I mistake my view; The sun itself sees not till heaven clears. 
 O cunning Love! with tears thou keep'st me blind, Lest eyes well-seeing thy foul faults should find. 
 
 
 148.
 Что за глаза у сердца моего? Любовь, ты искажаешь всё на свете! А может из упрямства своего Не слушает мой мозг приборы эти? 
 Настолько любит мозг свои глаза, Спешит исправить зримые картины? Предпочитает верить в чудеса И в мир привычных мнений, часто мнимых? 
 Как может быть? вокруг беда и слёзы, Как оправдать обманные глаза? Но, впрочем, верно, что нет веры грёзам; Так солнце прячет лик пока гроза. 
 О, хитрая Любовь! ты слепишь глаз, Чтоб не заметил вздор твоих гримас. 
 
 
 
 
 149.
 Canst thou, O cruel! say I love thee not, When I against myself with thee partake? Do I not think on thee, when I forgot Am of myself, all tyrant, for thy sake? 
 Who hateth thee that I do call my friend? On whom frown'st thou that I do fawn upon? Nay, if thou lour'st on me, do I not spend Revenge upon myself with present moan? 
 What merit do I in myself respect, That is so proud thy service to despise, When all my best doth worship thy defect, Commanded by the motion of thine eyes? 
 But, love, hate on, for now I know thy mind; Those that can see thou lovest, and I am blind. 
 
 
 149.
 О, ужас! говорить, что не любил я, Когда себе под кожу я залез? Ужель бесплодны все мои усилья? Ужель во мне мучитель не исчез? 
 Разве с презренным злом я в дружбе ныне? Разве бесплоден глупый мой вопрос? Зачем чернее ночи ты, богиня? За что ты мстишь мне диким стоном гроз? 
 Чем заслужил твоё расположенье И гордости презрительный отказ, Ведь обожал я каждое мгновенье, Когда светило солнце милых глаз? 
 Любовь, я разгадаю ребус твой; Ты любишь тех, кто видит; я слепой. 
 
 
 
 
 150.
 O, from what power hast thou this powerful might With insufficiency my heart to sway? To make me give the lie to my true sight, And swear that brightness doth not grace the day? 
 Whence hast thou this becoming of things ill, That in the very refuse of thy deeds There is such strength and warrantize of skill That, in my mind, thy worst all best exceeds? 
 Who taught thee how to make me love thee more The more I hear and see just cause of hate? O, though I love what others do abhor, With others thou shouldst not abhor my state: 
 If thy unworthiness raised love in me, More worthy I to be beloved of thee. 
 
 
 150.
 Откуда столько силы, столько власти Пленять сердца, притягивать умы? О, почему несбыточное счастье В плену иллюзий, узников тюрьмы? 
 Какой болезнью сердце поразила, Что, отвергая помощь и тепло, Оно внимает гибели и силе, И темнотой твоей увлечено? 
 Кто научил тебя внушать любовь, И тем сильней, чем больше ненавижу? О, наказанье, мир, мне приготовь, Но для меня ты станешь только ближе: 
 Уж если даже грех люблю я твой, Каков же свет твой, добрый мой герой. 
 
 
 
 
 151.
 Love is too young to know what conscience is; Yet who knows not conscience is born of love? Then, gentle cheater, urge not my amiss, Lest guilty of my faults thy sweet self prove: 
 For, thou betraying me, I do betray My nobler part to my gross body's treason; My soul doth tell my body that he may Triumph in love; flesh stays no father reason; 
 But, rising at thy name, doth point out thee As his triumphant prize. Proud of this pride, He is contented thy poor drudge to be, To stand in thy affairs, fall by thy side. 
 No want of conscience hold it that I call Her love for whose dear love I rise and fall. 
 
 
 151.
 Про совесть знает юная любовь; А от любви рождённый что узнает? Сомненьем дерзким мне не прекословь, Во мне свои ошибки отрицая: 
 Я изменил предательскому телу, Тебе, неверный, верен до конца; Зависит тело от души всецело; У зеркала нет мысли и лица; 
 И, если ты возвысишься над плотью, Она вознаградит тебя с лихвой. Не возгордись, о дворянин в лохмотьях, Работай и останься сам собой. 
 Как, чередуя всходы и закаты, Работают небесные громады. 
 
 
 
 
 152.
 In loving thee thou know'st I am forsworn, But thou art twice forsworn, to me love swearing, In act thy bed-vow broke and new faith torn, In vowing new hate after new love bearing. 
 But why of two oaths' breach do I accuse thee, When I break twenty? I am perjured most; For all my vows are oaths but to misuse thee And all my honest faith in thee is lost, 
 For I have sworn deep oaths of thy deep kindness, Oaths of thy love, thy truth, thy constancy, And, to enlighten thee, gave eyes to blindness, Or made them swear against the thing they see; 
 For I have sworn thee fair; more perjured eye, To swear against the truth so foul a lie! 
 
 
 152.
 Ты, верно, знаешь, я нарушил слово, Но ведь и ты два раза обманул, Любовью клялся ты и верой новой, Потом презреньем слову моему. 
 Но почему упрёк лишь в двух изменах, Хотя я двадцать клятв переступил? Нарушил много я обетов ценных, Тебя во многом ложно обвинил, 
 Но мне хотелось, видят небеса, Клятв верности твоей, любви и правды, И, чтоб добиться, я слепил глаза И изучал их хитрые ландшафты; 
 И клялся я, и клятвы нарушал, Чтоб испытать на прочность идеал! 
 
 
 
 
 153.
 Cupid laid by his brand, and fell asleep: A maid of Dian's this advantage found, And his love-kindling fire did quickly steep In a cold valley-fountain of that ground; 
 Which borrow'd from this holy fire of Love A dateless lively heat, still to endure, And grew a seething bath, which yet men prove Against strange maladies a sovereign cure. 
 But at my mistress' eye Love's brand new-fired, The boy for trial needs would touch my breast; I, sick withal, the help of bath desired, And thither hied, a sad distemper'd guest, 
 But found no cure: the bath for my help lies Where Cupid got new fire - my mistress' eyes. 
 
 
 153.
 Амур, уснувший, факел обронил: Его нашла охотница-богиня, Невдалеке холодный ключ бурлил, И погрузился огнь в источник синий; 
 Отдав потоку свой священный жар, Пламя Любви усилило бурленье, К воде целебной вскоре млад и стар Путь проложили с целью исцеленья. 
 Но тот, кто ищет от любви покой, Тот не найдёт лекарства от дурмана; Хотел и я спасительной водой Унять тоску и успокоить раны, 
 Но было тщетно: ключ меня не спас, Меня излечит пламя милых глаз. 
 
 
 
 
 154.
 The little Love-god lying once asleep Laid by his side his heart-inflaming brand, Whilst many nymphs that vow'd chaste life to keep Came tripping by; but in her maiden hand 
 The fairest votary took up that fire Which many legions of true hearts had warm'd; And so the general of hot desire Was sleeping by a virgin hand disarm'd. 
 This brand she quenched in a cool well by, Which from Love's fire took heat perpetual, Growing a bath and healthful remedy For men diseased; but I, my mistress' thrall, 
 Came there for cure, and this by that I prove, Love's fire heats water, water cools not love. 
 
 
 154.
 Однажды задремал Амур - малыш, Забыв и факел и огонь горящий, Тут нимфы строгие прокрались в тишь, И вынули огонь из ручки спящей; 
 И тотчас жаром вспыхнули сердца У чистых дев, согретые любовью; Так, сон отринув, пленник из дворца На мир взирает, восхищённый новью. 
 В холодном теле этот жар полезный Горит, соединяя нить времён, Он - доброе лекарство от болезней; Но я, любви покорный, исцелён 
 И миру говорю, что человек Согрет огнём, негаснущим вовек. 
 
 
 

 Сонеты Шекспира привлекают своей загадочностью: с одной стороны, они взаимосвязаны, в них общие персонажи рассказчика и слушателя; они образуют группы, в которых беседа ведётся явно на общую тему: аргументация начинается в одном сонете, логически продолжается в другом и поддерживается в третьем; с другой стороны, тема разговора имеет привычку необъяснимым образом менять направление (хотя, даже и в этом случае, ощущение единства содержания интуитивно сохраняется), причудливо меняется настроение рассказчика: он то превозносит своего собеседника, то вдруг резко (если не сказать грубо) за что-то его порицает. Происходит явственное недопонимание, чем вызвана подобная метаморфоза. Она сбивает с толку. Сбивает с толку современного читателя и, наверняка, озадачивало того, с кем ведётся беседа. Многие исследователи творчества Шекспира пытались разрешить этот вопрос: может быть, дело в личной жизни великого поэта? Может быть, нужно отыскать прототипы главных гороев? Но, тщетно.Сведений о жизни Шекспира мало. И нет надежды, что когда-нибудь их станет больше. И остаётся литературоведам, натыкаясь на противоречия, недоуменно пожимать плечами: что подразумевал великий поэт, неизвестно... 
 Между тем, если есть загадка, должна существовать и ее отгадка. Если автор загадал нам загадку, сопроводив её многочисленными намёками, выдающими факт её существования, автор же должен и подсказать, в чём заключается смысл загадки и где отыскать ключ, который всё объяснит. Нужно только следовать за автором. Внимательно и настойчиво. И непонятности - пропадут. Возможно, не все. Но многие. 
 Есть у меня идея, благодаря которой все сонеты из разнородного набора слабосвязанных групп связуются в единое целое, обретая дополнительный смысл (помимо того, разумеется, который и так всем очевиден). И я готов эту идею назвать. Назвать одним словом. Готовы ли вы к ней? Она проста. Это идея реинкарнации. 
 В самом деле. В сонетах Шекспира беседуют двое. Дадим им для определённости имена. Первый - это Мудрец. Он начинает беседу. Второй - его Наследник, его слушатель. Два главных героя - Мудрец и Наследник. Цикл Сонетов - это диалог между ними. Однако, нужно сделать оговорку: Хоть героев и два, тем не менее, можно сказать и так, что герой - один. Такая вот занимательная диалектика! Потому что, Мудрец и Наследник - это одна и та же сущность. Наследник - есть новое воплощение Мудреца. Это жизнь души Мудреца в новом физическом теле. Мудрец умер. Вернее, умер тот человек, в теле которого жил дух Мудреца. 
 
 
 
 
 
 Когда мой прах забудут небеса, 
 
 И кость, истлев, отдаст земле все соки 
 
 Быть может, попадутся на глаза 
 
 Тебе, мой друг, скупые эти строки 
 (Сонет 32)
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 Теперь дух Мудреца "живет" в другом человеке, теперь он воплотился в Наследнике. И, будучи в ином воплощении, будучи в новом теле, с другими мозгами, костями и мясом, он утратил информацию о своей мудрости, о своих знаниях. Был мудрецом, стал молодым человеком, "молодым грубияном и деревенщиной", "заключившим контракт со своими ясными глазами" (как нелицеприятно характеризует его Шекспир в первом сонете). Понятна опасность нового существования: проходя путь от рождения к поиску ответов на важнейшие жизненные вопросы, человеку не на что опереться. Вновь рожденный, он вынужден начинать жизнь с уровня беспомощной клетки. Постигать все заново: учиться ползать, ходить, лепетать. Получать новый опыт новой жизни. И есть опастность не достигнуть того состояния знания, каковым обладал в прошлом. Остаться на уровне "грубияна" и "деревенщины". В том случае, если не почувствуешь в себе Вечный Дух Мудреца, существующий в твоём теле, и до тех пор, пока не поймёшь, что Он начинает с тобой беседу. 
 И вот первый сонет Шекспира - и есть начало беседы Мудреца, вечного духа, пребывающего в каждом, с человеком, который без осознания этого духа в себе пребывает в состоянии "грубияна" и "деревенщины". 
 Мне возразят, что так не бывает? Что тот, кто умер, не может ни начать, ни вести беседу с тем, кто жив. 
 Да, мертвые не разговаривают. Но вот довод: Шекспир умер; однако, он готов беседовать с тем, кто готов его услышать. Почти четыре века прошло с его смерти, и косточки сгнили, а он - разговаривает! Нехитрое доказательство существования: тот, кто разговаривает, тот - живой! 
 Традиционно первые 17 сонетов рассматриваются таким образом, что будто тот, от лица которого написаны сонеты, убеждает того, к кому сонеты обращены, "жениться и произвести на свет потомство". Действительно, если читать сонеты поверхностно, может сложиться и такое впечатление: что речь идёт о банальных уговорах и банальном сватовстве. На полном серъёзе выдвигаются версии и ищется прототип: кого это так пылко уговаривает Шекспир? Указывают на Уильяма Герберта, графа Пембрука, будущего лорда-канцлера Англии. Будто сохранились данные, что "родные юного аристократа, рано потерявшего родителей, хлопотали о его женитьбе" и, "возможно, они привлекли модного сочинителя Шекспира для содействия их планам". 
 Однако, господа, все эти поиски превращают Поэзию в "водевиль". Впрочем, кто хочет, тот считает эти шаткие основания достаточными. О, если б знали из какого сора растут стихи. Но я полагаю, что речь идёт не о физических детях, не о физическом потомстве. Вспомним Пушкина: 
 
 
 
 
 
 Ты - царь: живи один. Дорогою свободной 
 
 Иди куда влечёт тебя свободный ум, 
 
 Усовершенствуя плоды любимых дум, 
 
 Не требуя наград за подвиг благородный. 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 Итак, дети поэта - это его стихи, это его творения, это "плоды его любимых дум". Вот о чём идёт речь. Вот каких детей имеет ввиду Шекспир и тот, от лица которого ведётся повествование. И сразу становится понятен и логичен переход к следующим сонетам сонетного цикла. К нему я ещё вернусь. 
 Пока же хочу сказать, что сонеты - есть Художественное Произведение. Они не исчерпываются реальными событиями, хотя в них и возможно усмотреть некую аналогию присходящего в Англии во времена жизни Шекспира. И обращены сонеты не к современнику, не столько к реально существовавшему лицу, а ко многим. И более всего, сонеты обращены к потомкам: к нам с вами. К людям, живущим столетия спустя, и к тем, кто будет жить после нас. 
 Два героя шекспировских сонетов - Мудрец и Наследник - это художественные персонажи. Как Гамлет. Как Король Лир. Как Отелло. Их отличие от Гамлета, Лира и Отелло только в том, что они - безымянные, неназванные. Мудрец и Наследник живут своей жизнью, придуманной им автором. Мудрец не сводится к Шекспиру, а Наследник не сводится к графу Пембруку. У героев - своя линия поведения, у каждого - свой характер. Часть сонетов разоваривает языком Мудреца (написана от имени Мудреца), часть сонетов - языком Наследника. В них разная стилистика! 
 Более того, герои настолько разные, что между ними происходит конфликт. Происходит величайшая Ссора, которая завершается величайшим Миром. Конфликт заключается в том, что Мудрец обещает Наследнику бессмертие. Наследник недоумевает. Он растерян непониманием того, как такое возможно? С одной стороны, он готов идти за Мудрецом, когда тот говорит о Любви, о Свете, о Доброте. С другой стороны, он совершенно обескуражен тем, что иногда Мудрец выражается слишком грубо, называет его вором, изменником, грешником. А иногда - просто насмехается. Язвительно и обидно. 
 В конце концов, эти противоречия усиливаются настолько, что Наследник решает, что ему попросту морочат голову (а она у него и так идет кругом от услышанного). И следует немедленный взрыв - Наследник обвиняет Мудреца, что никакого бессмертия нет, и что всё, что тот говорит - есть полная чушь. Причём, выссказывает "наболевшее" в о-очень грубой форме. В настолько грубой, что в приличном обществе за такие слова следует немедленная дуэль. 
 Конфликт происходит в 66 сонете. Традиционно считается, что сонет посвящён обличению социальных язв. Традиционно считается, что он написан от лица того, от кого написаны и остальные сонеты. Я не согласен с этим: в сонетах Мудреца есть неизменная игра слов, есть всплески и падения. А 66 сонет - написан "неумелой" рукой (в кавычках, конечно, неумелой). Но, правда - там нет игры мысли. Игры нет! А есть бесконечное и длинное перечисление: "и это не так, и это не так, и это не так, и это". Написано но-вич-ком. 
 Что же Мудрец? Мудрец отвечает. За мальчишескую выходку Наследника он, если говорить прямо, сравнивает того с землёй (сонеты 67-70). Какое уж тут бессмертие! Наследник смят и раздавлен. Хочет уйти из жизни. Но, оказывается, что и он не лыком шит! Его ответ - великолепен! Он подстроил Мудрецу ловушку (сонеты 71-72). Наследник грозится покончить с собой (подтверждая, что обвинения 66 сонета - серъёзны) и просит (просьба умирающего священа!), чтобы Мудрец замолчал и взял свои слова обратно; чтобы не увлекал новых последователей идеей, которую Наследник считает ложной. Но Мудрецу есть чем ответить и на это (сонеты 73-74). Далее - ход Наследника (сонет 75). И вновь - Мудрец (сонеты 76-79). Читайте и вы увидите много интересного! 
 Причём, Мудрец в процессе этой беседы не только полностью переубеждает Наследника, но и совершает Поступок, который переворачивает течение сонетного цикла с ног на голову: он заявляет Наследнику, что у него пропал голос, от него улетела Муза и даёт понять, что труд и сонетный цикл остался незавершённым, и завершить его должен он - его Наследник. Наследник должен исправить ошибки и грубости Мудреца (вот хитрец!). А как это сделать? Планка поднята слишком высоко. Наследник чувствует, что сил у него - меньше, чем у его предшественника. Печаль его велика! Но - делать нечего - надо идти, надо преодолевать себя и пытаться соответствовать. Это трудно. Это неимоверно трудно. И в то же время, это очень красиво. 

 Вот так. Сонеты Шекспира делятся как бы на две части - в одной части беседу ведёт преимущественно Мудрец; во второй части - его Наследник. Симметрия - почти строгая. Композиция сонетного цикла - очень красивая. И диалог с 66 по 79 сонет - сказочно прекрасен. У меня нет слов, чтобы выразить, насколько он хорош. Почему до сих пор никто не увидел, что это - диалог? 
 Взор Поэта пронизывает прошлое, настоящее и будущее. Нам не дано предугадать, как слово наше отзовётся, но стремление понять, желание предугадать, заглянуть за границу собственной жизни - объединяет Поэтов. Разговор с теми, кто будет жить после нас - это естественная тема для Поэта и Художника. Примеров - множество. Вот один из них, возможно не самый удачный, но весьма определенный в своей простоте: 

 
 
 
 
 
 Слушайте, товарищи потомки, 
 
 агитатора, горлана-главаря. 
 
 Заглуша поэзии потоки, 
 
 я шагну через лирические томики, 
 
 как живой с живыми говоря. 
 (В.В.Маяковский)
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 Откуда он знает, что заглушит? Откуда он знает, что шагнёт? Что заговорит, живой с живыми? Он не знает, ибо знать этого нельзя... А ураган? А смерч? А пожары? А сгорят все лирические томики? С нелирическими впридачу? А перестройка и реформы? Кому он нужен теперь, главарь-горлан и агитатор? Но он Поэт! Поэтому - знает, что шагнёт! И знает, что заговорит! И заглушит! 
 Так ведь и Шекспир - Поэт! Отчего же, читая его сонеты - стихи, в которых тема Смерти и Бессмертия является основной - мы полагаем, будто адресованы они некоему молодому человеку, его современнику? Откуда это безудержное стремление принизить Поэта? Черт знает что получается от такого стремления! Читая, как автор обращается к собеседнику с бесконечными и пылкими признаниями в любви, мы не понимаем Природы и Глубины этого чувства, и посещают нас позорные подозрения: а нормальной ли ориентации был Вильям наш Шекспир? Можно ли такую страсть, такой напор испытывать к человеку одного пола? 
 Однако, собеседник его - это не его современник, это не конкретное лицо. Это - Человек. Человек вообще. Любой человек. Современник, потомок, хоть кто. Любовь к Человеку - это любовь к Жизни. Так дедушка любит внука, потому что годы старости сочтены и недалеко уже время ухода, а молодость - остается. И нет ничего в любви деда к внуку, что хоть отдаленно напоминало бы плотскую любовь. Старость любит жизнь и любит её во всех проявлениях, и любит её в тех, в ком она есть: дед любит внука; и любит друзей внука; и нерождённых пока детей своего внука; и внуков своего внука; и чужых внучат - тоже любит! Он любит будущее поколение, любит потомков и, если б мог, хотел бы заговорить с ними, как живой с живыми. 
 
 
 
 
 
 Младенца ль милого ласкаю, 
 
 Уже я думаю: прости! 
 
 Тебе я место уступаю; 
 
 Мне время тлеть, тебе цвести. 
 (А.С.Пушкин)
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 Вот какую Любовь подразумевает Шекспир, когда говорит в сонетах - "люблю". Вот о чем идёт речь! а вовсе не о противоестественной страсти некоего героя-извращенца. К графу Пембруку или кому другому. 
 Это любовь отца - к сыну, деда - к внуку, это - материнская любовь. Об этом - о том, что любовь материнская - сказано в Сонетах прямым текстом (believe me, my love is as fair As any mother's child, Сонет 21). Отчего те, кто хотят видеть в Белокуром Друге некоего современника Шекспира, не замечают этого? 



 2 * 7 * 11 = 154 математическое действие
 Из статьи Аркадия Горнфельда "Магия четырнадцати строк (история сонета)" (Энциклопедический словарь / Издатели Ф.А.Брокгауз, И.А.Ефрон, СПб., 1900, Т. XXXa.): 

 "Сонет (по-французски - sonnet, от итальянского sonettо или старофранцузского sonet - песенка) - небольшое стихотворение, состоящее из двух четверостиший (quatrains) на две рифмы и двух трехстиший (tercets) на три рифмы. К этим правилам строгая теория правильного сонета прибавляет ещё некоторые условия: рифмы в четверостишиях должны чередоваться в порядке abba, abba (в трехстишиях - как угодно); женские рифмы должны сменяться мужскими, так что, если сонет начинается женской рифмой, он закончится мужской и наоборот; обязателен пятистопный ямб, так что сонет должен заключать 154 слога; воспрещено повторять слово, уже употреблённое в стихотворении; каждая строфа должна составлять законченное по смыслу целое. Лишь соблюдение этих требований даёт, по указанию Буало ("Art poetique"), сонету ту высшую красоту, благодаря которой, как гласит классический стих, "безупречный сонет не уступает поэме". Но эти суровые требования исполняются далеко не всегда..." 
 Замечу, что эти "суровые требования" не исполняются не только далеко не всегда, а - никогда не исполняются. Впрочем, это неудивительно: требования - противоречивы в своём определении. Так невозможно написать сонет пятистопным ямбом с чередованием мужских и женских рифм, чтобы он заключал 154 слога. 
 Остаётся только догадываться какими на самом деле должны быть требования правильного сонета. Откуда взялось это странное требование, чтобы идеальный сонет содержал 154 слога? В чём его смысл? И есть ли в нём смысл вообще? 
 С другой стороны, сонетов Шекспира - ровно сто пятьдесят четыре. Ни больше, ни меньше. То есть ровно столько, сколько слогов должен заключать правильный сонет. Возможно, это совпадение. А возможно, и нет. Я предполагаю, что цикл сонетов Шекспира представляет собой некий мета-сонет. Этакий Сонет Сонетов. Некий "зашифрованный" сонет, который подлежит расшифровке, с использованием различного рода ключей. Может быть отдельные сонеты играют в результирующем сонете роль этаких слогов? Правда, как зацепиться? Как понять, какой именно слог зашифрован в том или ином сонете? Сразу скажу, что у меня нет определенности в этом вопросе. Возможно, подсказку нужно искать в так называемых неправильных сонетах. Возможно, их расшифровка укажет последующий алгоритм сопоставления. "Неправильных" сонетов несколько: во-первых, сонет с кодой (99). Во-вторых, с сокращенным числом строк (126). В-третьих, сонет, состоящий из четырех стоп (145). В-четвертых, сонет с пропущенным словом (146). 
 Еще кое-что о нумерологии сонетов. Число сто пятьдесят четыре, разлагается на простые множители: на двойку, семёрку и одиннадцать. Нетрудно заметить, что данная последовательность весьма похожа на знаменитые три карты из повести Александра Сергеевича Пушкина "Пиковая дама", на знаменитый секрет, который открыла Германну старая графиня: "Тройка, семёрка, туз". Отличие - в одной карте (двойка и тройка). 
 Но ведь секреты не передаются открытым текстом! В последовательности, полученной Германном, есть ошибка. На неё намекает Пушкин, приводя слова сошедшего с ума Германна, который, сидя в шестнадцатом нумере Обуховской больницы, повторяет "тройка, семерка, туз, тройка, семерка, дама", производя, как видно, замену туза дамой. Неправильная замена! Нужно не туза дамой заменять, а тройку - двойкой. 
 Две поставленные карты сыграли, третья - не сыграла, - новая информация о том, что "два" - правильное число, "три" - неправильное. В полученном наборе "тройка, семёрка, туз" из трёх указанных чисел - два правильных, а третье - используется как помеха, шифрующая сообщение. Другими словами, "три" - число неправильное, "два" - правильное. Следовательно, если мы заменим неправильную "тройку" правильной "двойкой", то получим неискажённую, верную, подразумеваемую комбинацию: двойка, семёрка, туз. Сонет! 
 После ряда утверждений, которые могут показаться несколько неожиданными, смелыми и не вполне обоснованными, хочется перейти к подробному анализу сонетов. Моё глубокое убеждение, что сонетный цикл Шекспира - это не "собранье пёстрых глав", не разрозненные сонеты, слабо связанные друг с другом. А сгусток! Где нити тянутся отовсюду и где всё переплетено. 
 О первом сонете и первом катрене сложно рассуждать в этой связи. Он - как верхушечка айсберга, видимый небольшой своей частью. Основная же часть ледяного великолепия оказывается сокрытой под водой. 
 Итак, 
 
 
 
 
 
 From fairest creatures we desire increase, 
 
 That thereby beauty's rose might never die 
 
 By as the riper should by time decease 
 
 His tender heir might bear his memory: 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 Подстрочный перевод таков: 
 
 
 
 
 
 От прекраснейших созданий мы страстно желаем преумножения, 
 
 Чтобы, таким образом, никогда не умирала роза красоты, 
 
 Но как зрелости наступает пора умирания, 
 
 Её любящий наследник должен сохранять о ней память: 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 Первое, что привлекает внимание - это чёткость и ясность изложения. Спокойная рассудительность, втиснутая в тесноту сонета. Человек знает, что говорит. Человек начинает разговор о смерти, но говорит о ней не эмоционально и не спонтанно (сравните, например, с "Не жалею, не зову, не плачу:" Сергея Есенина), но предельно логично и обдуманно. Ощущается, что человек взвесил каждое своё слово (впрочем, вероятно, иначе и быть не может: сонет не располагает к многословию) и обращается к собеседнику не потому, что ему горько осознавать неотвратимость собственного ухода, но потому, что существуют более важные вопросы: не должна умирать роза красоты. Важно, донести до потомков и наследников, до тех, кто остаётся, в чём состоит красота, о чём нужно помнить и чему нужно научить внуков. 
 Вообще, последовательность изложения Шекспира - просто поразительная: высказывается идея, которая затем развёртывается, дополняется, подкрепляется. Словно говорит собеседнику: "говорю тебе то-то, а из этого следует это, а из этого - вот это". И снова, снова и снова. Предельная насыщенность мысли и изначальной идеи! Будто и не мысль это, не слово, не выражение, не предложение. А будто - действие! Инструкция! Файл, сжатый архиватором! Как упакованный файл, будучи развёрнутым, содержит гораздо больше осмысленной информации, так и сонет расцвечивается красками, в результате того, как читатель начинает сопоставлять между собой его частички: первый катрен со вторым, начало с концом, конец с серединой. Сонет как бы оживает, и начинает свой разговор. И, по мере того, как разворачивается мысль, яснее становится то, о чём говорилось ранее. Это удивительно! 
 Поясню на примере. Что такое "beauty's rose" (роза красоты) ? Сначала неясно. То ли - просто "цветок", то ли образ. Если образ, то какой? Почему - роза? Почему не фиалка? Почему роза не умирает? Ведь всё умирает в этом мире. И об этом говорится: "зрелости наступает пора умирания". А "роза красоты" - говорится во второй строчке - не умирает. Как это может быть?! Третья строка спорит со второй! Заявляет, казалось бы, полную противоположность только что сказанному! Что это такое - "роза красоты"? Что за загадку задаёт нам Шекспир, говоря, что всё умирает, но не умирает роза красоты? 
 А вот что: сонет - есть "роза красоты"! Знание, которое должно передать наследнику, - есть "роза красоты". Сама мысль, высказанная в первом катрене, - есть "роза красоты". Мысль, только что озвученная, о том, что всё увядает, но красота - не должна увядать, - есть "роза красоты". Наследники - должны сохранять память о красоте, и передавать её своим наследникам, так же как они узнали о ней от своих предшественников. Этакая стереоскопия тезиса: в нём есть не только некое информационное содержание, но ещё и одновременная иллюстрация этого содержания! И намёк на дополнительную информацию! Когда догадываешься, что тот, кто начинает разговор, вполне возможно, узнал однажды об этой мысли от своего предшественника. А тот - от своего. И когда думаешь об этом, охватывает некий трепет от прикосновения к чему-то важному и возвышенному, что передаётся из поколение в поколение изустно. Передаётся теми, кто знает о том, что такое "красота" и кто хочет рассказать о красоте своим наследникам. 
 И ещё, мысль первого катрена - предельно лаконична. Удивительно, как столь краткими средствами можно поведать о столь важных вещах! И, притом, сохраняя предельную ясность и логику! Ведь когда начинаешь обдумывать сказанное, когда, находя новые оттенки смысла, начинаешь составлять комментарий, то понимаешь, что комментарий, призванный выявить глубину оригинала, - утрачивает его лаконичность. Любой комментарий утрачивает красоту оригинала! Любой комментарий не может передать красоты оригинала, как не может передать её - любой перевод. И чем более многословен комментарий, - тем менее в нём осталось от первоначальной красоты оригинала. Вот горе-то комментарию! И, одновременно, чем более многословен, следовательно - некрасив, комментарий, тем более он обнаруживает красоту оригинала, прекрасного своей краткостью (в том случае, разумеется, если комментатор не начинает рассуждать о вещах, которые не содержатся в оригинале вовсе). Ибо красота сонета - в краткости формы и в информационной насыщенности, которая в нём может заключаться, несмотря на эту краткость. В насыщенности, которую бывает трудно заметить, благодаря той же самой краткости формы. Вот отчего пусть будет мой комментарий многословен, следовательно - уродлив, однако, надеюсь, что он, своим объёмом, поможет привлечь внимание к красоте оригинала. Сонет - как бриллиант, способный играть в зависимости от того, под каким углом зрения его рассматривают. В конце концов, не для того же даровал Шекспир нам этот бриллиант, чтобы мы проходили мимо него. 
